 




<CFRNO>21 CFR Parts 20 and 101</CFRNO>



<RINDOCK>[Docket No. 85N061D]</RINDOCK>



<RINDOCK>RIN 0905AB67</RINDOCK>


Food Labeling; General Requirements for Health Claims for Dietary Supplements


<AGENCY>
AGENCY:

 Food and Drug Administration, HHS.


</AGENCY>
<ACTION>
ACTION:

 Final rule.



</ACTION>
<SUMMARY>
SUMMARY:

 The Food and Drug Administration (FDA) is amending its food labeling regulations to make dietary supplements of vitamins,
minerals, herbs, or other similar nutritional substances (dietary supplements) subject to the same general requirements
that apply to all other types of food with respect to the use of health claims that characterize the relationship of
a substance to a disease or health-related condition on the label or in labeling and the content of petitions for obtaining
authorization for such health claims. This action is being taken in response to provisions of the Nutrition Labeling
and Education Act of 1990 (the 1990 amendments) and the Dietary Supplement Act of 1992 (the DS act) that bear on health
claims.

 
</SUMMARY>
<DATE>
EFFECTIVE DATE:

 July 5, 1994.


</DATE>
<FURTHER>
FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:

 James R. Taylor, Jr., Center for Food Safety and Applied Nutrition (HFS158), Food and Drug Administration,
200 C St. SW., Washington, DC 20204, 2022055229. 


</FURTHER>
<SUPPLEM>
SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION:

 


I. Background


On November 8, 1990, President Bush signed into law the 1990 amendments (Pub. L. 101535). This new law amended
the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (the act) in a number of important ways. One of the notable aspects of the 1990
amendments is their confirmation of FDA's authority to regulate health claims on food labels and in food labeling.
The new provisions amended the act by adding a provision, section 403(r)(1)(B) (21 U.S.C. 343(r)(1)(B)), that provides
that a product is misbranded if it bears a claim that characterizes the relationship of a nutrient to a disease or health-related
condition, unless the claim is made in accordance with sections 403(r)(3) of the act (which pertains to foods in conventional
food form) or 403(r)(5)(D) (which pertains to dietary supplements). 
Congress enacted the health claims provisions of the 1990 amendments to help U.S. consumers maintain healthy dietary
practices and to protect these consumers from unfounded health claims. The House Report of June 13, 1990, states,
``Health claims supported by significant scientific agreement can reinforce the Surgeon General's recommendations
and help Americans to maintain a balanced and healthful diet'' (Ref. 1). In addition, the statement of the House Floor
Managers noted that ``There is a great potential for defrauding consumers if food is sold that contains inaccurate
or unsupportable health claims'' (Ref. 2). The House Report characterized the need for regulation of health claims
as ``compelling'' (Ref. 1). 
FDA's first step to effect the health claims provisions of the 1990 amendments appeared in the form of a November 27,
1991, proposed health claims regulation (56 FR 60537) (hereinafter referred to as ``the health claims proposal'').
That document proposed to establish general requirements pertaining to the use of health claims that characterize
the relationship of a food component to a disease or health-related condition on the labels and in labeling of both
foods in conventional food form and dietary supplements. The health claims proposal contained definitions to clarify
the meaning of specific terms used in the regulations, preliminary requirements that a component of food must meet
to be eligible to be the subject of a health claim, a scientific standard for assessing the validity of claims, general
labeling requirements for health claims that are permitted by regulation, and prohibitions on certain types of health
claims. Also, the health claims proposal contained provisions pertaining to the required content of petitions for
health claims. 
In response to the health claims proposal, FDA received over 6,000 letters, each containing one or more comments,
from consumers, health care professionals, universities, State and local governments, foreign governments, trade
organizations, consumer advocacy organizations, research institutes, industry, and professional organizations.
Many of the comments pertained to dietary supplements. The agency summarized and addressed the issues raised in the
comments in the final rule on health claims that published in the 

Federal Register

 of January 6, 1993 (58 FR 2478) (hereinafter referred to as ``the health claims final rule''). The health claims final
rule became effective on May 8, 1993. 
Although the health claims proposal pertained to dietary supplements as well as foods in conventional food form,
the final rule applied only to the latter type of foods. In October of 1992, Congress passed the DS act (Pub. L. 102571),
which imposed a moratorium on FDA implementation of the 1990 amendments with respect to dietary supplements until
December 15, 1993. The DS act provides that by June 15, 1993, FDA was to have issued proposed rules to implement the 1990
amendments with respect to dietary supplements, and that by December 31, 1993, the agency is to issue final rules based
on these proposals. The DS act also amends the 1990 amendments to reflect the fact that if the agency does not issue final
rules with respect to health claims for dietary supplements by December 31, 1993, the proposed regulations are to
be considered final regulations at that time. 
In the 

Federal Register

 of June 18, 1993 (58 FR 33700), FDA responded to the DS act by issuing a proposal that sets forth a standard and procedure
for making health claims for dietary supplements (hereinafter referred to as ``the dietary supplement health claims
proposal''). In that proposal, FDA proposed to make health claims on dietary supplements subject to the same general
requirements that apply to health claims on all other types of food.
In response to the dietary supplement health claims proposal, FDA received over 1,200 letters, each containing one
or more comments, from consumers, health care professionals, universities, State and local governments, trade
organizations, consumer advocacy organizations, research institutes, industry, and professional organizations.
Some comments agreed with one or more provisions of the proposed rule without providing further grounds for support
other than those provided by FDA in the preamble to the proposal. Other comments disagreed with one or more provisions
of the proposal without providing specific grounds for their disagreement. Many comments addressed issues that
are beyond the scope of these regulations and will not be addressed in this document. For example, some responded to
various aspects of FDA's June 18, 1993, advance notice of proposed rulemaking concerning the general regulation
of dietary supplements (58 FR 33690). Most of the comments, however, addressed the proposed regulations and provided
specific grounds in support of their positions. The agency has summarized and addressed the issues raised in the comments
in the discussion that follows. 


II. Regulatory Approach


A. General Approach Based on FDA's Review of the 1990 Amendments 


The 1990 amendments did not provide a specific standard for when a health claim should be authorized on dietary supplements
or a specific procedure for authorizing such claims. Under section 403(r)(5)(D) of the act, the establishment of
such a standard and such a procedure is left to the Secretary of the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services (DHHS)
(and, by delegation, FDA). Thus, in the dietary supplement health claims proposal (58 FR 33700 at 33702), FDA reviewed
the legislative history of the 1990 amendments to identify the features that Congress intended would guide the agency's
choice of a scientific standard and procedure for regulating health claims on dietary supplements. FDA identified
the following features that it believes should guide its choice:


o The regulations are to deal only with the procedure and standard for health claims for the substances in dietary supplements.
They are to have no bearing on the availability of any dietary supplements. 
o The regulations must prohibit the use of health claims that are not authorized under their provisions. 
o The regulations must ensure that any health claims that appear in labeling are scientifically valid.
o The regulations must ensure that any health claims that appear in labeling are understandable.
o The regulations should be such that all segments of the food industry are treated fairly and in a consistent manner,
unless there is an appropriate basis on which to draw a distinction. This factor embodies a principle of equity implicitly
in the act.



(58 FR 33700 at 33703)



With these features in mind, FDA considered all of the approaches of which it was aware that might be used to regulate
dietary supplements. The agency tentatively concluded that it should adopt an approach that would subject dietary
supplements to the same standard that applies to foods in conventional food form. FDA stated that it was its tentative
view that that approach strikes the appropriate balance between the congressional concern for consumer fraud, public
health, and sound science, on the one hand, and the desire to provide the consumer with information on the other. Furthermore,
the agency advised that if it adopts this standard for dietary supplements, all foods will be regulated under the same
standard. 
FDA pointed out that under the same procedure that applies with respect to claims for substances in food in conventional
food form, there is a premarket review that ensures that the safety of the substance that is to be the subject of the claim
has been established as well as the scientific validity of the claim. A claim linking a substance to a disease, whether
on a food in conventional food form or on a dietary supplement, is intended to increase intake of that substance. Thus,
the agency said, it is important to ensure that a claim encouraging such increased intake can be safely implemented.
Therefore, FDA proposed to adopt the same procedure for health claims for dietary supplements as for foods in conventional
food form. 


1. Availability of Dietary Supplements


1. A great many comments, primarily from consumers, raised objections that indicated that the commenters were misinformed
about the proposed regulations, or that they simply did not believe what FDA stated in the dietary supplement proposal.
Many of the comments expressed considerable anger, resentment, and even fear over the proposal. A large number of
these comments characterized the proposal as an attack against the dietary supplement industry. Many of these comments
stated that FDA is plotting to ban all dietary supplements. A number of comments explained that the proposed regulations
would limit the number of dietary supplements available to consumers by limiting the amount of health information
that could appear on supplement labels and thus diminish supplements' marketability. The comments maintained that
FDA's proposed policy of requiring premarket review of a supplement's safety is contrary to the agency's stated intent
to preserve supplement availability and consumer choice. Some of the comments maintained that many manufacturers
would be put out of business. Many of the comments argued that the nation's health would be adversely affected, and
that health care costs would increase without dietary supplements to maintain good health. Some comments contained
testimonials that certain dietary supplements were responsible for curing and preventing a variety of diseases,
including cancer. 
However, a few comments pointed out that assertions that FDA plans to ban dietary supplements are unfounded. A number
of these comments predicted that the vast majority of dietary supplements will remain in the marketplace because
about 80 percent of supplement labels are already in compliance with the proposed provisions. 
There is no basis for virtually all of the concerns raised in the comments about the availability of dietary supplements.
Nothing in these regulations will make them unavailable to consumers. These regulations focus only on ensuring that
health claims, if made on the labels or in the labeling of dietary supplements, are scientifically valid and understandable.
Thus, the availability of dietary supplements will not be affected by these regulations. While it is likely that some
claims may have to be removed from product labeling as a result of this final rule, the products themselves can continue
to be marketed.
It is true that prohibiting the use of claims that have not been authorized by FDA may have an adverse impact on the marketability
of some products. However, any such impact is outweighed by the need to assure consumers that the claims that are made
in labeling are scientifically valid, and that they can rely on such claims. In fact, the only products whose marketability
will ultimately suffer under these regulations will be those whose labeling has borne claims that cannot be supported
by the available scientific evidence. 
The requirement that the agency be confident that the presence of a health claim will not result in unsafe intakes of
the substance that is the subject of the claim is not inconsistent with supplement availability and consumer choice.
If a manufacturer does not choose to make a claim about a substance, nothing in these regulations will affect the manufacturer's
ability to continue to market supplements that contain that substance. FDA believes, however, that it has an obligation
to ensure that before it authorizes a claim that encourages consumers to increase their consumption of a substance,
it have some assurance that increased consumption of that substance will not be harmful. 


2. Fair and Consistent Treatment of All Segments of the Food Industry


2. Many comments asserted that FDA has not been evenhanded in its approval of health claims for use on dietary supplements
and on foods in conventional food form. Some of these comments maintained that FDA's unfair treatment of dietary supplements
is evidenced by the agency's approval of health claims involving cancer and coronary heart disease for use on fruits,
vegetables, and grain products but not for use on fortified foods or supplements that provide fiber or antioxidant
vitamins. The comments stated that FDA should authorize health claims involving particular nutrients for use on
any food that contains those nutrients, including dietary supplements, unless there is significant scientific
agreement that the claim is valid only when the nutrient is consumed in a particular form. To ensure that such an approach
is taken in evaluating health claims for use on dietary supplements in the future, a few comments requested that FDA
add the following provision to the end of 101.14(g) (21 CFR 101.14(g)):


A health claim that has been approved for any substance that is to be consumed at other than decreased dietary levels
shall be permitted on all foods (including dietary supplements) containing the requisite amounts of that substance,
unless FDA determines that (i) there is significant scientific agreement (as defined in subparagraph (c)) that the
consumption of the substance in the particular food will not provide the benefits claimed, or (ii) the food contains
disqualifying amounts of another substance. 


A few comments contended that FDA also has treated dietary supplements unfairly by withholding approval of a health
claim concerning the role of folic acid in reducing the risk of neural tube defects (NTD's) simply because of its concerns
that allowing the claim on foods in conventional food form would raise safety issues because of overfortification
of the food supply and the subsequent effect on certain subpopulations. These comments asserted that the proper course
of action for the agency would have been to allow health claims on dietary supplements but to prohibit their use on foods
in conventional food form until the public health concerns associated with such use had been resolved. 
However, a few comments supported FDA's decision to approve particular health claims for use on fruits, vegetables,
and fiber-containing grains while not authorizing their use on dietary supplements or fortified foods with added
antioxidant vitamins or fiber. These comments noted that there are many compounds in fruits and vegetables that may
be involved in reducing the risk of disease that may not have been identified. The comments asserted that before allowing
a dietary supplement to bear a health claim authorized for use on food in conventional food form, it is important to
establish that the supplement provides the same health protection benefits as the conventional food.
FDA disagrees with the assertions in the comments that it has been unfair with the dietary supplement industry with
respect to its approval of specific health claims. FDA believes that the health claims should be consistent with the
scientific evidence available to the agency. In the 

Federal Register

 of January 6, 1993 (58 FR 2537, 2552, and 2622), FDA explained why it was authorizing health claims pertaining to: (1)
Heart disease and diets low in saturated fat and cholesterol and high in fruits, vegetables, and grain products that
contain fiber; (2) cancer and diets low in fat and high in fruits, vegetables, and grain products that contain fiber;
and (3) cancer and diets low in fat and high in fruits and vegetables that may contain fiber, vitamin A (

beta

-carotene) and vitamin C. The agency also explained in detail why it was not authorizing health claims pertaining
to any specific nutrients (i.e., heart disease and dietary fiber, cancer and dietary fiber, and cancer and antioxidant
vitamins). 
In the case of the antioxidant vitamins, FDA found that although there was sufficient evidence to justify a health
claim concerning the relationship between diets low in fat and high in fruits and vegetables that may contain fiber,
vitamin A, and vitamin C and a reduced risk of cancer, the available evidence did not provide a basis on which to attribute
the reduction in risk of disease to any individual vitamin or combination of vitamins, regardless of whether the vitamin
is classified as an antioxidant or not (see discussion under section IV., 58 FR 2622 at 2633). Yet, because of the usefulness
of vitamins A (as 

beta

-carotene) and C and dietary fiber in identifying those fruits and vegetables that correlate with reduced cancer
risk, FDA identified these nutrients as being characteristic of the foods associated with a protective effect. Any
one or a combination of these three nutrients can serve as the identifying marker. Moreover, because fruits and vegetables
are also characterized by an absence of fat, and because of the identified relationship of low fat diets to reduced
risk of cancer, FDA highlighted low fat intakes as part of the dietary pattern associated with decreased cancer risk.
Because the mechanism of the protective effect of fruits and vegetables is not known, and because it is not possible
to determine which of the nutrients or other components in fruits and vegetables is causing the observed effect, the
health claim authorized by FDA focuses on fruits and vegetables as a class of foods and their relationship to cancer
risk, and not on particular nutrients. By requiring that all characterizing nutrients be identified as characteristic
of dietary patterns rich in fruits and vegetables without specifically attributing reduced cancer risk to a single
nutrient or single type of nutrient (antioxidant vitamins), FDA made the claim consistent with the scientific knowledge
available to it at the time it authorized the claim.
Because of the rapidly evolving science base relative to this topic, however, FDA has continued to update its evaluation
of the scientific evidence and the degree of scientific agreement on the relationship between antioxidant vitamins
and cancer. As part of these efforts, FDA initiated, along with other major research and health organizations as cosponsors,
a public conference on antioxidant vitamins and cancer and cardiovascular disease that was held on November 1 through
3, 1993. The transcript of that meeting has been submitted to the Docket as a comment on the antioxidant vitamins and
cancer rulemaking, along with other comments received in response to the announcement of the conference (58 FR 54595,
October 22, 1993). FDA is reviewing the results of this conference and other scientific evidence that has become publicly
available since the publication of the January 6, 1993, final rule on antioxidant vitamins and cancer.
Similarly, in the case of heart disease and dietary fiber and of cancer and dietary fiber, the agency found that there
was insufficient evidence to attribute the reduction in risk specifically to dietary fiber or to specific fiber components.
The agency did conclude, however, that dietary fiber and soluble fiber, along with other nutrients, serve as useful
markers in identifying those foods for which the scientific evidence showed that inclusion in a daily diet was associated
with reduced risk of cancer and of heart disease (58 FR 2552 and 58 FR 2537).
For both topic areas, the agency also noted the inability of commonly used analytical methodologies to detect many
of the characteristics that vary among dietary fibers and that may be related to biological function (e.g., particle
size, chemical composition, water-holding capacity). With regard to heart disease, other components variable
associated with soluble fiber in foods (e.g., lipid components) may also contribute to a cholesterol-lowering effect.
FDA found that the inability to detect many of the differences among fibers, fiber components, and other substances
in foods that contain dietary fibers, including soluble fiber, and the general lack of conclusions as to the mechanism
of action of dietary fibers and fiber components were limiting factors on FDA's ability to draw conclusions from the
available evidence. Furthermore, FDA noted that foods high in dietary fiber are also generally low in calories and
total fat, factors that are associated with reduced risk of cancer. Fiber-rich foods are also generally low in saturated
fats and cholesterol, substances that also affect the risk of developing heart disease. Thus, some or all of the benefits
associated with diets high in fiber-rich foods could be the result of displacement of fat and saturated fat from the
total diet rather than an effect of fiber per se.
The agency stated that although the specific roles of the numerous potentially protective substances or displacement
of negative substances (e.g., fat, saturated fat, and cholesterol) in such plant foods are not yet understood, populations
with diets rich in these foods experience many health advantages, including lower rates of heart disease and cancer.
Thus, FDA did not authorize the use of a health claim on the association between ingestion of dietary fiber, or specific
fiber components, and a reduced risk of heart disease or cancer. Instead, for cancer, FDA, to be consistent with the
available scientific evidence and prevailing scientific agreement, focused on fiber-containing grain products,
fruits, and vegetables as product classes. Similarly, for heart disease, FDA focused on fruits, vegetables, and
grain products that contain fiber, particularly soluble fiber. Because of the usefulness of dietary fiber or soluble
fiber in identifying the types of foods whose consumption is most likely to correlate with decreased cancer or heart
disease risk, these substances can serve as identifying markers for selecting useful foods, even in the absence of
adequate evidence of a direct effect of fiber.
FDA is aware, however, of the rapidly evolving nature of the science base relative to these topic areas. FDA intends
to update its review of the science by initiating, in the near future, along with other major research and health organizations
as cosponsors, a public symposium on dietary fiber and heart disease and cancer.
With respect to assertions concerning folic acid, FDA disagrees that it should have allowed health claims on dietary
supplements while prohibiting their use on foods in conventional food form. While FDA did not authorize a health claim
for folic acid and NTD's, in the final rule on heath claims and label statements for folic acid and NTD's published in
the 

Federal Register

 of January 6, 1993 (58 FR 2606) (hereinafter referred to as ``the folic acid final rule''), the agency did announce
its plans to work expeditiously to authorize a claim, if appropriate.
The agency noted that the Public Health Service (PHS), including FDA, had recommended (Ref. 7) that all women of childbearing
age in the United States should consume 0.4 milligram (mg) (400 micrograms (&mu;g)) of folic acid daily to reduce their
risk of having a pregnancy affected with spina bifida or other neural tube defects. FDA acknowledges that this recommendation
evidenced that significant scientific agreement existed regarding a relationship between folate and NTD's but
said that there were factors that prevented FDA from authorizing a claim. The agency said that the act must be read as
a whole, and that sections 403(r)(3)(A)(ii) and 409 of the act (21 U.S.C. 348) reflect the proposition that the use
of a substance that is the subject of a health claim must be safe. The agency pointed out that the PHS recommendation
stated that there were significant questions that persist about the safe use of folic acid in food. As stated in the
folic acid final rule, FDA expected that the authorization of a claim would likely result in significant increases
in consumption of folic acid by women in their childbearing years and by the general population, because manufacturers
would add folic acid to their products in order to claim that these products were useful in reducing the risk of birth
defects. Intakes of multiple doses of folic acid from supplements and from its increased presence in the food supply
could rapidly result in intakes of 3 to 7 mg (3,000 to 7,000 &mu;g) per day (58 FR 2606 at 2614). Such intakes represent
increases of 10fold or more above current intakes. 
In the folic acid final rule, the agency reviewed the safety considerations raised by such increases in folic acid
intakes, including: (1) Potential effects in persons with poor vitamin B12 status; (2) potential risks for persons
taking medications that interfere with folate metabolism; (3) potential risks for pregnant women because of uncertainties
about effects of high blood levels of folic acid on the embryo during gestation; and (4) uncertainties regarding possible
interactions between folic acid and other nutrients with increased folic acid intakes. The agency concluded that
it could not authorize a health claim on folic acid until the questions regarding the safe use of this nutrient were
satisfactorily resolved. In the folic acid final rule the agency described the efforts it was undertaking to address
and resolve these concerns. 
Following publication of this document, based on its review of the evidence, its discussions with an advisory committee,
and its review of the comments that it received, the agency tentatively concluded that the safety problems raised
by folic acid can be resolved by setting a safe upper limit of intake of 1 mg folate per day for all population groups.
The agency announced its tentative conclusion in a proposal to authorize a health claim on folate and neural tube defects
(58 FR 53254, October 14, 1993). In companion documents, FDA also proposed to amend the food additive regulation for
folic acid to specify the foods that could be fortified with folic acid and the level at which they could be fortified
(58 FR 53312) and to amend the standards of identity for specific cereal-grain products to permit the addition of folic
acid (58 FR 53305).
Thus, based on this review of the agency's actions, it is clear that the nondiscriminatory provision suggested in
the comments is not necessary. When FDA has concluded that a substance has a relationship to a disease, FDA has acted
to authorize a claim (see final rule on calcium and osteoporosis (58 FR 2665) and the proposed rule on folic acid and
neural tube defects (58 FR 53254)). In the case of antioxidant vitamins and cancer, dietary fiber and heart disease,
and dietary fiber and cancer, the evidence did not establish that the named substances had an effect on the named diseases.
The evidence showed that these nutrients were merely markers of foods that had been shown in studies to affect the risk
of the disease. FDA has reflected the scientific evidence in the claims that it has authorized and proposed to authorize.
Any other course of action would be inconsistent with the act because it would result in claims that were both not scientifically
valid and misleading.


B. Alternative Approaches


In the dietary supplement health claims proposal (58 FR 33700 at 33703), FDA advised that a variety of approaches had
come to FDA's attention about how health claims for dietary supplements would best be regulated under the 1990 amendments.
These approaches came to the agency's attention by various means, including the comments on the health claims proposal
that addressed the most appropriate method for regulating dietary supplements, testimony before Congress about
implementation of the 1990 amendments, as well as the legislative history of the 1990 amendments. FDA carefully evaluated
each of these approaches to determine how they compare with the characteristics that FDA has listed above. A number
of comments addressed the agency's tentative conclusions about these approaches. 


1. Use of Advisory Committees


In the dietary supplement health claims proposal (see section II.B.1., 58 FR 33700 at 33704), FDA advised that it had
tentatively decided not to adopt a committee-based approach suggested in comments for evaluating the validity of
health claims on herbs. This approach, known as the Botanical Ingredient Review (BIR), would involve the establishment
of expert panels under the direction of an oversight committee. FDA would participate as a nonvoting member of the
expert panels. The oversight committee, which would be charged with the responsibility of reviewing all health claim
petitions pertaining to herb or botanical components, would relieve FDA of all responsibility for initial review
of these petitions. Each expert panel would conduct an evaluation of scientific data pertaining to the requested
claim, subject the evaluation to peer review, and prepare a final recommendation about the claim. The recommendation
and all supporting documents would then be forwarded to FDA, and the agency would be permitted 120 days to approve,
disapprove, or modify the report. Under draft regulations prepared and submitted for FDA adoption by one comment
on the health claims proposal, there would be a codified presumption in favor of the committee recommendation. 
The agency based its tentative decision about the BIR on its belief that the suggested approach would involve a significant
transfer of agency authority on health claims because of this presumption in the draft regulations submitted by the
comment. Under this presumption, FDA would be obligated to prove that the committee was wrong if the agency decided
not to follow the committee's recommendation. In such circumstances, FDA could be forced to propose to authorize
health claims that it was not satisfied were scientifically valid. FDA noted that there is no basis under the act for
such a transfer. Also, the agency noted that the creation of such a committee would be financially burdensome and stated
that it would be inappropriate to commit its limited resources to a committee with as narrow a scope as that suggested
by the comment.
3. A few comments addressed this advisory committee issue. Some comments voiced opposition to FDA's tentative decision
not to establish a BIR. These comments disputed the agency's assertion that the establishment of a BIR would involve
any transfer of authority, noting that FDA would retain full and final discretion in approving health claims. The
comments also disputed FDA's finding that the creation of a BIR would be burdensome and costly in light of the agency's
limited resources. The comments stated that such a finding is inconsistent with FDA's current use of advisory committees
for very narrow subject matters such as over-the-counter (OTC) antiplaque products, circulatory system medical
devices, and drug abuse. The comments stated that the use of a BIR to help screen petitions from the much larger herbal
products industry would be an efficient, economical, and scientifically credible way to ration FDA's scarce resources
and would also help FDA meet statutorily-imposed deadlines for actions on petitions that it might not otherwise be
able to meet. 
The comments also asserted that the agency's statement that it has the ``ultimate responsibility to determine whether
the petitioned-for health claim is valid'' implies a mistrust of the integrity of the BIR process and the involved
scientists and reveals an agency belief that it is the only authority competent to judge the scientific validity of
health claims for herbal dietary supplements. The comments disagreed with such a conclusion and argued that health
claim petitions will only receive adequate and full consideration from the scientific community best qualified
to determine whether they meet the significant scientific agreement standard set by Congress through the creation
of a BIR, which would represent the most competent and knowledgeable body in a field that remains largely esoteric
to FDA. One of these comments suggested that appropriate selections for herbal experts panels might include experienced
herbal practitioners who are familiar with potential adverse reactions to herbs as well as medical practitioners
in foreign countries where herb safety has been studied by government and industry panels. The comment stated that
the inclusion of foreign medical practitioners would be especially appropriate during the evaluation of a claim
whose merits are agreed upon throughout the world but are not generally recognized in the United States, such as in
the case of using peppermint tea for its soothing or carminative effects on the digestive tract. 
However, one comment supported the agency's tentative decision not to adopt the BIR process. The comment stated that
FDA could well be legally liable for decisions made by the BIR that were later shown to have placed the public health
at risk.
Several comments called for FDA to establish an advisory committee for health claims for dietary supplements where
the committee would select expert panels responsible for the evaluation of proposed health claims for all dietary
supplements. The comments suggested that the expert panels should be composed of scientists and health care professionals
with expertise on a given nutrient-disease relationship as well as nonvoting industry and consumer representatives.
These comments contended that one reason for the agency's slowness in approving a health claim for folic acid has been
its reliance on advisory panels that were not sufficiently familiar with the research in the area and who had to be educated
about the strength of the evidence before they could act. Some of these comments suggested that FDA could retain the
authority to reject the recommendations of the committee, as long as it published its reasons for doing so. 
Another comment stated that both the dietary supplement industry and FDA have been slow to recognize and utilize a
great deal of research that has been done in the area of nutrition and health. The comment attributed this slowness
to a gap between the scientific community, FDA, and the dietary supplement industry. The comment suggested that in
order to close this gap, FDA should form a committee of its leading scientists to meet with a similar industry committee
every 3 to 6 months, or as required, to discuss the latest research in the area of nutrition and health published in highly
accredited scientific journals so that the research could be used to create and support health claim petitions. The
comment suggested that when the agency committee and the industry reach an agreement on the data, FDA could authorize
the use of a health claim on the nutrient-disease relationship on which there is agreement. 
FDA recognizes that advisory committees may make valuable contributions in assisting the agency to evaluate scientific
evidence about health claims in certain circumstances. For example, the Folic Acid Subcommittee of the Food Advisory
Committee provided valuable recommendations in support of FDA proposing to authorize a health claim for folic acid
and proposing to fortify cereal-grain products. The agency intends to continue its use of advisory committees wherever
the need arises. 
FDA believes, however, that it should retain the right to decide when the use of an advisory committee is necessary.
There may frequently be circumstances in which evidence establishes that use of advisory committees is not necessary
because the evidence shows that the claim is clearly supported or clearly not supported. In addition, if the agency
were to establish a standing advisory committee for health claims, FDA would want it to have a broader focus than just
dietary supplements. FDA's view is that claims should focus on the substance, and not the food in which it is found,
because the primary issue is whether the substance-disease relationship has been established. Thus, if FDA were
to establish a standing advisory committee, it would be on health claims in general. Although a number of comments
asserted that FDA lacks knowledge of herbal products, the agency believes that its personnel are fully competent
to evaluate properly substantiated petitions concerning health claims in this area. Also, if the agency were to decide
to establish an advisory committee, it would take steps to ensure that the membership of the committee had the necessary
expertise, including pertinent expertise on herbal products.
There is an implication in some of the comments that the evaluation of the scientific evidence supporting a claim is
somehow different depending on the substance involved. In fact, whether a claim is for a vitamin, mineral, herb, or
other similar nutritional substance, including fat, saturated fat, and cholesterol, the skills needed for evaluation
of a claim are basically the same. These skills are found in epidemiologists, nutritionists, biostatisticians,
clinicians, and experts in the disease being addressed, as well as in people aware of how the substance is, or should
be, consumed. Thus, FDA does not agree with the implication in these comments.
FDA is interested in having communication with the dietary supplement industry. However, the agency does not believe
that it would be appropriate for the communication to take the form of the suggested standing committee to meet with
a similar industry committee every 3 to 6 months. While FDA believes that regular communication with the dietary supplement
industry is likely to be useful, the process by which health claims are authorized must be a more open and public process
than that suggested by the comment. Certainly the 1990 amendments envisioned a public process for claims for substances
in foods in conventional food form, as reflected in section 403(r)(4) of the act. FDA has been presented with no convincing
reason why a similar process should not apply to claims for substances in dietary supplements. 
Furthermore, FDA continues to believe that the BIR advisory committee approach would involve a significant transfer
of agency authority for health claims, even though comments on the health claims proposal and the dietary supplement
health claims proposal have made arguments to the contrary. The suggested regulation for health claims that was submitted
to FDA on May 10, 1991, and referred to by the agency in the proposals that it has issued, states in part:
B. If the Committee determines that a proposed health claim is appropriate for a particular herb or botanical, either
as proposed or as modified by the Committee, it shall forward its recommendation(s) to FDA together with all the data
and other information before the Committee when it made its decision.
C. If the Committee determines that, on the basis of the data, and other information before it, the proposed health
claim is not scientifically justified for the herb or botanical, it shall so notify the proposer. The proposer may
then direct the Committee to forward to FDA all the information before the Committee with respect to the proposal together
with its conclusions and the reasons therefore.
D. Within 120 days of receipt of the information described in (B) and (C) above, FDA shall either accept the recommendation,
reject it, or modify it based upon the Agency's independent evaluation with analysis and reasons for rejection or
modification of recommended health claims. In arriving at its decision FDA may consider data or information other
than that before the Committee. 

There shall be a presumption, to be sustained when the record is viewed as a whole, in favor of a Committee recommendation
under either (B) or (C).

 (Emphasis added.)
Despite assertions to the contrary, the last sentence of paragraph ``D'' obligates FDA to establish that the committee
was wrong in order not to follow the committee's recommendation. Ultimately, therefore, there would, in fact, be
a significant transfer of authority if the suggested provision were to be adopted by FDA. As FDA noted in the dietary
supplement health claims proposal (58 FR 33700 at 33704), there is no basis under the act for such a transfer of authority.
FDA does not question that experts on an industry committee or panel on herbs and botanicals could be helpful. The agency
encourages firms to work through such groups. For this reason, FDA revised the provision pertaining to petitions
in the health claims final rule to clarify that the agency will consider all recommendations by such committees and
panels (see 101.70(b)). FDA recognizes that those petitions that have undergone an independent scientific
review and received endorsement by qualified expert groups will likely be well-supported petitions and could be
very persuasive to FDA. Further, FDA is likely to place considerable weight on the recommendations of outside experts,
and its decision as to whether a petition should be granted could be influenced significantly by these experts. 
Although FDA encourages firms to work through groups of outside experts, the agency would be concerned if such groups
were heavily weighted with medical practitioners as one of the comments suggested. Over reliance on such practitioners,
to the exclusion of scientists representing other relevant scientific descriptives, implies that the herbs are
to be used for medicinal purposes. FDA stresses again that health claims are about the relationship of foods, rather
than drugs, to a disease or health-related condition.


2. Establishment of an Approach Based on a More Lenient or the Same Standard


FDA proposed to subject dietary supplements to the same scientific standard and procedure that the statute provides
for foods in conventional food form (section 403(r)(3)(B)(i) of the act). The standard, codified in 101.14(c),
states:


(c) Validity requirement. FDA will promulgate regulations authorizing a health claim only when it determines, based
on the totality of publicly available scientific evidence (including evidence from well-designed studies conducted
in a manner which is consistent with generally recognized scientific procedures and principles), that there is significant
scientific agreement, among experts qualified by scientific training and experience to evaluate such claims, that
the claim is supported by such evidence. 


FDA explained in the dietary supplement health claims proposal (58 FR 33700 at 33705) that it knows of no standard and
procedure for dietary supplements that would both be more lenient than the standard and procedure for foods in conventional
food form and yet still have the characteristics that FDA considers necessary under the 1990 amendments and their
legislative history. The agency stated that it had tentatively concluded that a standard for health claims for dietary
supplements that is based only on section 403(a)(1) of the act (21 U.S.C 343(a)(1)), or that allows health claims based
on the existence of substantial scientific evidence, even though significant scientific agreement about the validity
of the claim does not exist, would be inconsistent with Congress's desire to ensure that health claims that are made
on food, including dietary supplements, are scientifically valid. FDA said that it was concerned that if it were to
allow claims in the marketplace whose validity had not been established, these claims would undercut the credibility
of those health claims that are in fact valid. The agency said that if it were to allow such claims, consumers would be
left little better off, and no less confused, than they were in 1989, before the passage of the 1990 amendments. FDA
also expressed its tentative view that the proposed approach strikes the appropriate balance between the congressional
concern for consumer fraud, public health, and sound science, on the one hand, and the desire to provide the consumer
with information on the other (58 FR 33700 at 33706). 
4. A large number of comments asserted that FDA should establish an approach based on a more lenient standard for dietary
supplements. Some of these comments argued that such an approach is directed by Congress and cited a statement of Senator
Hatch, one of the primary authors of the 1990 amendments, that ``a more lenient standard for dietary supplement[s]
is envisioned.'' One comment argued that by providing for the establishment of a separate standard for dietary supplements,
Congress had implicitly rejected the rigid standard of ``significant scientific agreement'' adopted for foods
in conventional food form. The comment asserted that FDA was therefore bound by basic tenets of statutory construction
to adopt a more lenient standard for dietary supplements, as such an action would give meaning to Congress's instructions,
whereas the adoption of the proposed standard would in effect render those instructions meaningless. The comment
noted that courts have traditionally not interpreted provisions of a statute in ways that would render other provisions
superfluous. 
A number of comments stated that using the same standard and procedure for dietary supplements as for foods in conventional
food form is counter to the intent of the 1990 amendments because Congress intended to make more, rather than less,
information about the health benefits of dietary supplements available to consumers. The comments asserted that
health information about the effects of diet on disease is particularly important to consumers of dietary supplements
in deciding which products to buy. 
Several comments argued that restricting this information on dietary supplements will deny millions of Americans
the information that they need to improve their health and to help reduce their risk of deadly afflictions such as heart
disease and cancer. The comments asserted that such restriction will cost the nation millions of dollars in health
care expenditures that could have been saved through disease prevention. 
Some comments expressed concern that restricting the use of properly qualified health claims based on preliminary
evidence would encourage information-hungry consumers to seek information about the health benefits of various
dietary supplements from sources such as books and the media, which may be unreliable and which are not regulated by
FDA. These comments argued that adopting a policy that results in consumers turning to information that may well be
misleading or outright false is contrary to the educational goals of the 1990 amendments. One comment stressed that
FDA should assist consumers by encouraging them to reduce their risk of disease by changing their diets, lifestyle,
and other factors. 
Comments suggested that FDA should place more weight on the potential benefits of the health information than on eliminating
all possibility for consumer misunderstanding or all elements of risk associated with increased consumption of
dietary supplements. A few of these comments advised that a more lenient standard would be appropriate for dietary
supplements because they are being sold to educated consumers rather than to the general population. Some of these
comments disputed the argument that consumers could be misled by a more lenient standard. These comments noted that
consumers continue to rely on health messages on products such as cigarettes and condoms, despite the fact that the
messages have changed over the years in response to new scientific findings. Other comments stated that studies have
indicated that consumers are able to use various advertising claims about diet and disease in a rational and beneficial
manner.
Several comments asserted that FDA should allow the use of preliminary health claims on dietary supplements and foods
in conventional food form because it allows their use on drugs. The comments stated that FDA's proposed revision of
the``Pediatric Use'' subsection of prescription drug labeling in the 

Federal Register

 of October 16, 1992 (57 FR 47423) would allow prescription drugs that had not been tested for safety and efficacy in
children to nevertheless be given to children provided that the drugs' efficacy claims were qualified by the statement,
``Safety and effectiveness in children have not been established.'' The comments stated that because these drugs
had not been tested for safety and efficacy in children, their claims would be ``preliminary'' at best and misbranding
at worst. 
However, many comments argued against a more lenient standard and procedure for dietary supplements. Several comments
stressed that the adoption of the proposed standard and procedure is supported by the legislative histories of the
1990 amendments and the DS act. One of these comments maintained that while the 1990 amendments give FDA the option
of adopting a more lenient standard for dietary supplements, the Congressional Record denotes a majority opinion
in favor of FDA applying the same standard to supplements that the act provides for conventional foods.
A number of comments also warned FDA that holding dietary supplements and foods in conventional food form to different
standards for health claims would lead to consumer confusion, as the health benefits of nutrients derived from dietary
supplements would be allowed to be characterized as superior to the benefits of those same nutrients derived from
foods in conventional food form. Some comments asserted that the creation of public confusion would directly undermine
the intent of the 1990 amendments to clear up consumer confusion about health claim information and would jeopardize
consumer confidence in existing health claims, food labels, and the government, particularly public health officials.
Another comment asserted that adopting a more lenient standard for dietary supplements could also allow some supplement
manufacturers to make unsubstantiated claims and undercut consumer belief in the credibility of the entire supplement
industry. These comments asserted that a single universal standard would best prevent consumer confusion by ensuring
that health claim information is uniform on all foods. 
Several comments supported the same standard and procedure on the grounds that it would ensure that health claims
appearing on the labels of dietary supplements are based on reliable, peer-reviewed, reproducible evidence. A number
of these comments stated that because supplements, unlike conventional foods, are taken specifically for the health
benefits associated with them, it is especially important that health claims on these products be reliable because
more and more consumers are using these products in the belief that the products will protect their health. The comments
said that these consumers were responding to the large amounts of recent evidence indicating that vitamins, minerals,
and other nutrients may play a role in reducing the risk of chronic diseases. 
Some comments cautioned FDA that the failure to ensure that health claims on dietary supplements are reliable would
leave consumers open to fraud. A few of these comments pointed out that many consumers do not have the scientific knowledge
to judge the veracity of label claims for themselves and presume that FDA regulations ensure that label claims are
properly substantiated. One of these comments warned that older Americans are especially vulnerable to fraud. This
comment pointed out that the elderly suffer disproportionally from diet-related diseases, read supplement labels
more often than other people, are more trusting of salespersons, and do less research than younger consumers. Other
comments warned that unsubstantiated health claims can harm consumers by inducing them to consume products that
are inherently unsafe, to consume excessive doses of some substances, or to forego more beneficial forms of treatment
for a given malady.
A number of comments insisted that the proposed regulations will not restrict the flow of information on nutrition
and health to consumers. One of these comments stated that roughly 80 percent of supplement labels are already in compliance
with the proposed regulations. Other comments noted that educational materials are not covered by the proposed regulations,
and that there are many available channels through which information can be freely disseminated other than food labeling.
Moreover, one comment contended that supplement labels are neither intended, nor currently used, to educate the
public but instead serve to sell the product to which they are attached.
Some comments stated that applying the same standard to both conventional foods and dietary supplements would create
a desirable ``level playing field'' for all food processors and manufacturers. One comment stated the adoption of
the proposed standard will provide an atmosphere in which all food manufacturers can move toward the production of
healthier foods, which will benefit the public health. 
In FDA's reconsideration of how best to regulate dietary supplements, one of the most significant issues has been
the issue of whether supplements should be regulated under a more lenient standard or the same scientific standard
as that established by Congress for food in conventional food form. Despite assertions by some that Congress directed
that a more lenient standard be established, the legislative history of the 1990 amendments does not support such
a position. To the contrary, as other comments point out, and as the agency explained in the preambles of the health
claims proposal (56 FR 60537 at 60539 through 60540), the health claims final rule (58 FR 2478 at 2507 through 2509),
and the dietary supplement health claims proposal (58 FR 33700 at 33703), Congress did not intend that the agency be
forced to adopt a different standard for dietary supplements. Instead, Congress gave the agency the discretion to
adopt any appropriate scientific standard and procedure for dietary supplements. There was nothing in the comments
that indicated that FDA does not have this discretion. Indeed, as some of the comments pointed out, there was considerable
support in both the House of Representatives and the Senate for adoption of the same scientific standard and procedure
for dietary supplements. FDA addressed the position of members of Congress on this issue in the preamble of the dietary
supplement health claims proposal (58 FR 33703):


Senator Hatch left no question about his position that FDA should use this flexibility [to adopt the standard and procedure
for dietary supplements that appears appropriate to the agency] to adopt a more lenient standard * * * 
However, other members of Congress were equally clear about their position that FDA should not adopt a more lenient
standard. In the October 24, 1990 Congressional Record at S 16608 [Ref. 4], Senator Metzenbaum, the other primary
author of the Senate amendments, stated: 


* * * It is my view that there is no reason to do anything other than utilize the same procedure and standard for dietary
supplements.
Whatever approach the Secretary takes, he must establish a system that evaluates the validity of health claims for
dietary supplements. The system must be based on the same considerations that guide other agency decisions: public
health, sound scientific principles and consumer fraud. 


Further, the House of Representatives clearly did not support a more lenient standard for dietary supplements. The
statement of House Floor Managers that appears in the October, 26, 1990 Congressional Record at H 12953 [Ref. 2] states:



* * * Whatever approach the agency takes, it must adopt a system that evaluates the validity of any disease claims made
with respect to these substances. Its system must be based on considerations of public health and consumer fraud.
As in every similar decision made by the agency today, we fully expect that the agency's evaluation of disease claims
made with respect to vitamins will be based on sound scientific principles. 
There is a great potential for defrauding consumers if food is sold that contains inaccurate or unsupportable health
claims. The potential is just as great for vitamins as it is for other products. In our view, vitamins and other substances
covered by this provision should be subject to at least as strong a standard as is applicable to other foods that contain
claims that the food will treat a disease or health condition. 


Nothing in the DS act or its legislative history indicates in any way that Congress changed its position about its goals
of the 1990 amendments with respect to prohibiting misleading health claims and improvement of the public health
through use of valid and understandable claims in food labeling [Ref. 3].


Although Congress left no question that the exact standard and procedure for the regulation of health claims for dietary
supplements is left to the discretion of FDA, and although Congress did not provide direct guidance concerning how
FDA should use this discretion, Congress did provide considerable general guidance about the intent of the health
claims provisions of the 1990 amendments. In view of the fact that this guidance does not distinguish between dietary
supplements and foods in conventional food form, FDA considers this guidance to be applicable to both types of foods.
As pointed out above in this response, Senator Metzenbaum, the other primary author of the Senate amendments, stated
that whatever approach the Secretary takes, he must establish a system that evaluates the validity of health claims
for dietary supplements. He stressed that the system must be based on the same considerations that guide other agency
decisions: Public health, sound scientific principles, and consumer fraud (Ref. 4). The quoted statements of the
House Floor Managers also stress that the agency's approach to regulating dietary supplements must be based on considerations
of public health, sound scientific principles, and consumer fraud (Ref. 2). In addition, these quoted statements
make it clear that Congress considered the use of ``inaccurate or unsupportable health claims'' on food labeling
to be harmful to the public (Ref. 2). Moreover, Mr. Waxman, one of the House Floor Managers stated the following in the
July 30, 1990 Congressional Record (H5844):


What we have sought to do is to permit health claims but only health claims based on scientifically valid information,
and we hope by having that scientifically valid information upon which a claim can be made, that health claims in the
future will be healthful and not misleading. 


Furthermore, as the agency pointed out in the January 6, 1993 

Federal Register

 (58 FR 2478 at 2526): 


By enacting the 1990 amendments, Congress sought to ensure that health claims would be scientifically valid and not
misleading. (See, for example, statement of Rep. Madigan, and statement of Rep. Waxman, [Ref. 2]). Experience had
shown that many ``unfounded'' health claims were being used on foods (statement of Rep. Waxman [Ref. 2]). Congress
recognized the ``great potential for defrauding consumers if food is sold that contains inaccurate or unsupportable
health claims.'' Id. (statement of House floor managers). 
In response to the high potential for health claims to be misleading, Congress legislated that any claim that is not
consistent with FDA regulations will misbrand a food. Section 403(r)(1)(B) of the act states that a food is misbranded
if its label or labeling contains a claim that ``expressly or by implication * * * characterizes the relationship of
any nutrient * * * of the food to a disease or a health-related condition unless the claim complies with regulations
promulgated by FDA. 403(r)(1)(B)'' (emphasis added). By taking this approach, Congress chose to permit only
those health claims on food that FDA determines to be scientifically valid, effectively recognizing that health
claims are so potentially misleading as to be inherently misleading. 


Applying the same standard and procedure to health claims on dietary supplements as that that applies to foods in conventional
food form will not affect the availability of any dietary supplements, will ensure that health claims that appear
in labeling are scientifically valid and understandable, and will subject all segments of the food industry to regulation
in a fair and consistent manner. Those comments favoring the same standard and procedure, for reasons of fairness,
control of consumer fraud, and conveyance of valid information about diet and its impact on a disease or health-related
condition, serve to reinforce FDA's conclusion that the agency's proposed rule should be finalized as proposed.
The agency disagrees with arguments that use of the same approach for dietary supplements as for conventional foods
would deny millions of Americans the dietary information that they need to improve their health and thereby cost the
nation millions of dollars in health care expenditures that could have been avoided. As FDA explained in the preamble
of the dietary supplement health claims proposal (58 FR 33700 at 33705):



* * * In the absence of adequate data to establish that health claims are valid, assertions about costs associated with
the lack of information in food labeling and about the benefits of consumption of substances in dietary supplements
are highly speculative and highly questionable. FDA does not agree that it should place more weight on the potential
benefits of the health information than on eliminating the possibility of consumer misunderstanding. FDA must weigh
the public health impact of permitting a multitude of preliminary claims against the possibility that a significant
portion of those claims will be determined to be not scientifically valid. The latter result would likely produce
a perception among many consumers that food labels and health claims, even those that are valid, are not reliable.
To the extent that, as a result, consumers do not change their dietary patterns to reduce their risk of disease, they
will be less healthy, and there will be more needless deaths from disease and more costs to the national economy, rather
than less. 



When FDA made this statement, the phrase ``adequate data to establish that health claims are valid'' was intended
to express the position that until the validity requirements of 101.14(c) are met, cost assertions about the
benefits of substance consumption are highly speculative and highly questionable. In general, prior to fulfillment
of this requirement, there may often be studies with a wide variety of strengths and weaknesses indicating that there
may, or may not, be a valid association between a substance and a disease or health-related condition. In deciding
whether or not to authorize a claim, FDA must consider that, while benefits may accrue from the availability of the
claim, there is a very real possibility that significant costs may accrue if the claim is authorized prematurely.
A few studies may often be found about a multitude of associations, and many, if not most, of those associations will
ultimately be found not to be valid. If FDA were to permit preliminary claims about such a multitude of associations,
the agency believes that ultimately what would be lost is the confidence of most consumers in the validity of all claims
that appear in food labeling. FDA believes that the costs to consumers of such a situation would prove to be greater
than the costs of not permitting preliminary claims. Of greater significance, however, is that needless deaths would
ultimately occur where consumers would not change their dietary patterns to adopt a more healthful diet. 
The agency believes that Congress, in its enactment of the scientific standard in section 403(r)(3)(B)(i) of the
act, struck what it believed to be an appropriate balance between the costs and benefits of claims on foods in general.
FDA is not aware of any reason to strike a different balance for dietary supplements. FDA would like to assure all affected
parties that the agency will move as expeditiously as possible to permit health claims once the scientific evidence
is sufficiently supportive to conclude that associations between substances and disease or health-related conditions
are valid. 
Although some comments asserted that claims based on a more lenient standard would not be confusing because consumers
of dietary supplements are more knowledgeable than the general population, FDA pointed out in the preamble of the
dietary supplement health claims proposal (58 FR 33700 at 33705) that there is nothing that limits the purchasers
of dietary supplements to ``knowledgeable consumers.'' The comments did not submit justification for FDA to change
its position in this regard. 
Assertions that use of the same scientific standard for dietary supplements as that established for food in conventional
food form is counter to the 1990 amendments because less information about diet and disease will be available to consumers
are not correct. Under the 1990 amendments, authorized health claims provide considerably more information about
the effects of diet on disease where the effects are recognized as scientifically valid than was the case before the
passage of the 1990 amendments. In the 

Federal Register

 of January 6, 1993, FDA authorized claims with respect to 7 relationships (see 58 FR 2537, 2552, 2622, 2665, 2739, 2787,
and 2820). Also, in the 

Federal Register

 of October 14, 1993 (58 FR 53254), FDA proposed to permit health claims concerning the relationship between folate
and the risk of neural tube birth defects. Admittedly, other health claims are not permitted to appear on food labels
and labeling, but Congress clearly intended through enactment of section 403(r) of the act that only valid health
claims be permitted.
With respect to concerns that consumers will be forced to seek information about diet and health from






unregulated sources such as books and the media, if FDA does not authorize preliminary claims, FDA advises that it
must implement the provisions of the amendments as Congress chose to enact them. The 1990 amendments focus only on
food labels and labeling. FDA cannot ignore its clear responsibilities under the 1990 amendments because of concerns
about the unregulated sources of information that were mentioned in the comments. Moreover, while such sources of
information may lead consumers to seek out products containing particular substances, FDA's action will ensure
that the labels and labeling of those products contain only scientifically valid information that can dispel any
misconceptions created by the unregulated sources. With respect to other concerns expressed by these comments,
the agency believes that the specific required elements in the health claims that it has authorized to date demonstrate
that the agency is encouraging consumers to reduce their risk of disease by changing their diets and lifestyle. For
example, the specific requirements in 101.72(c)(2)(A) requires, in part, that a claim about calcium and osteoporosis
make clear that an adequate level of exercise and a healthful diet are needed in addition to adequate calcium consumption.


Arguments that the agency should allow preliminary claims because of FDA's implementation of the drug provisions
of the act have no merit. Assertions about FDA's proposed action pertaining to ``Pediatric Use'' for drug labeling
in (57 FR 47423) are clearly wrong. The agency's proposed action with respect to requiring the statement ``Safety
and effectiveness in children have not been established'' pertains only to drugs for which there is no agency approval
for any pediatric population to use the drug. In point of fact, the agency proposed to require this statement as a further
warning that the product should not be used for pediatric populations. Thus, this action provides no support for authorizing
preliminary health claims. 
As FDA pointed out in the preamble of the dietary supplement health claims proposal (58 FR 33700 at 33706), making dietary
supplements subject to the same scientific standard and procedure as for conventional foods does not render section
403(r)(5)(D) of the act superfluous. This section requires that the agency consider what procedure and standard
respecting the validity of claims are most appropriate. This is what the agency has done. The fact that the agency has
found that, on balance, the standard and procedure established for foods in conventional food form are also the most
appropriate for dietary supplements does not render the agency's efforts invalid or the underlying provision superfluous.
The agency was charged with exercising its expertise and discretion, and that is what it has done.
5. A number of comments provided specific suggestions about the way in which a more lenient approach could be implemented.
Some comments argued that the approach should be sufficiently lenient to permit marketing of dietary supplements
without any restrictions. Some of these comments argued that dietary supplements needed no stringent requirements
because dietary supplements could be adequately regulated under the requirement in section 403(a)(1) of the act
that the labeling of a food must be truthful and not misleading. Other comments suggested that FDA could require a warning
informing the consumer that FDA had not substantiated particular claims appearing on a product. One comment suggested
that substantiated claims could be allowed to appear within a specific advisory panel of the label, while preliminary
claims would be allowed to appear only outside the panel. Another comment suggested that FDA adopt a split label approach,
in which preliminary health claims would be allowed, but the agency would have the right to comment upon them on the
label. 
One comment suggested that health claims for which there is substantial scientific evidence but not yet significant
scientific agreement be subject to a certification and notification procedure rather than rulemaking proceedings.
Under the procedure suggested by the comment, claims could be made for dietary supplements so long as: (1) The claim
expressly discloses the absence of scientific agreement as to the relationship, (2) the manufacturer provides FDA
with a fully documented certification by a panel of at least three qualified experts that there is substantial scientific
evidence supporting the claim, and (3) FDA does not disapprove the claim within 90 days of receipt of the certification.
(When additional information is needed, the 90 day period could be extended an additional 45 days.) Under this suggested
alternative, FDA would have an opportunity to participate in the selection of the expert panel. 
One comment requested that FDA only disallow the use of those health claims on dietary supplements that are not supported
by any evidence, and that it classify all other health claims into one of five categories and allow for their use on products
in conjunction with a code system indicating to consumers the level of substantiation that the claim has achieved.
The comment suggested that the highest category be full substantiation; the second, those claims that have a high
degree of substantiation as judged by non-FDA experts, but that FDA finds to be not fully substantiated; the third,
claims that have support in the form of double-blind placebo controlled studies published in peer-reviewed professional
journals; the fourth, claims that are supported by some evidence from in vitro studies, animal studies, or other studies
that do not involve humans; and the fifth, those claims supported by anecdotal evidence. In support of its call for
various approval levels, the comment stated that simply categorizing a claim as ``substantiated'' or ``unsubstantiated''
does not accommodate the reality that full substantiation of a health claim consists of cumulative evidence from
many studies. The comment maintained that if FDA were to place all claims that have not achieved full substantiation
into the same category, FDA would not be providing a means for the public to distinguish claims that are nearly substantiated
from those that are entirely false. Moreover, the comment stated that an agency determination that a claim is or is
not supported by ``significant scientific agreement'' often reflects a political decision rather than a scientific
one. The comments said that FDA panels comprise a very small percentage of the scientific community, that other scientists
often disagree with the panels' findings, and that there even may be differing opinions within the panels themselves.
The comment stated that, given these conditions, it is blatantly dishonest and misleading to the public for FDA to
make a general declaration that a claim is or is not substantiated. 
A few similar comments called for FDA to devise a multilevel approval scheme for health claims on dietary supplements
that would allow statements concerning the traditional use of a product to appear on the label and would permit the
label of a supplement that contained a substance that was the subject of a pending health claim petition to indicate
that the product was under FDA review for a health claim but not to indicate the nature of the claim. The comments stated
that the adoption of this approach would encourage manufacturers of products that qualify only for the ``traditional
uses'' or ``claim pending'' approval categories to gather, perform, and submit research information to FDA in order
to reach higher approval levels. 
One comment suggested that FDA allow manufacturers to use facsimiles of the FDA seal in conjunction with the various
ratings. The comment asserted that this approach would encourage manufacturers to come into compliance with FDA
regulations quickly, as the seals would become valuable marketing tools for which consumers look when purchasing
supplements, and the lack of a seal would become a marketing disadvantage for a company. 
FDA has considered these alternative standards and procedures suggested by the comments and finds that none of them
have the characteristics that are necessary to achieve the goal envisioned by Congress in passing the 1990 amendments.
Previously in this preamble the agency concluded that Congress intended that FDA adopt a scientific standard and
a procedure that ensure that health claims that appear in labeling are scientifically valid and understandable.
None of the alternative standards and procedures offered by the comments meets this objective. One of Congress' primary
concerns in passing the 1990 amendments was the widespread use of health claims whose scientific validity had not
been established (Ref. 1). The purpose of the 1990 amendments was to bring that situation under control. The problem
with the alternative procedures offered by the comments is that, rather than bringing the use of claims on dietary
supplements under control, they would ratify the state of affairs that caused Congress to act.
As FDA explained in the preamble of the dietary supplement health claims proposal, a standard for health claims for
dietary supplements that is based only on section 403(a)(1) of the act, or that allows health claims based on the traditional
use of the supplement or the existence of substantial scientific evidence but not significant scientific agreement
about the validity of the claim, would be inconsistent with Congress's desire to ensure that health claims that are
made on dietary supplements, or on any other food, are scientifically valid. FDA pointed out that if such claims were
to be permitted, consumers would be faced with a multitude of claims, some valid and some not valid. FDA stated that
it would be unlikely that consumers could distinguish between valid and invalid claims. Although comments on the
dietary supplement health claims proposal asserted that consumers would not be confused by a multitude of claims,
the comments did not actually go further in addressing how consumers would react to such a situation in food labeling.
More specifically, the comments did not provide data to resolve the question of whether consumers would be able to
understand gradations of scientific reliability of claims on food labeling, or whether consumers would, in fact,
be left as confused as they were before passage of the 1990 amendments. While a number of comments did assert that some
studies show that consumers are able to use various advertising claims about diet and disease in a rational and beneficial
manner, the studies were not actually submitted. In the absence of the studies, FDA has no basis upon which it can evaluate
the assertions of the relevance of the studies to food labeling. In the absence of evidence to the contrary, the agency
considers it more likely that consumers would be considerably confused by a multitude of claims with differing degrees
of reliability. One of the purposes of the 1990 amendments was to end such confusion (see statement of Mr. Waxman, 136
Congressional Record H12953 (Ref. 2)). Therefore, FDA rejects this assertion. 
Approaches such as those involving a ``split label'' or the use of an FDA seal would also not be consistent with the congressional
desire for scientific validity because manufacturers would still be able to market dietary supplements with claims
that were not scientifically valid. Even if FDA seals were being used to distinguish those claims that FDA considered
to be valid, there would be a question as to whether consumers would be able to ascertain which claims were preliminary
and which were not. These approaches would not restrict the number of health claims that were of questionable validity,
about which Congress was specifically concerned (Ref. 1). 
Thus, FDA has concluded that it would not be appropriate to adopt any of the alternative approaches suggested by the
comments. 
6. Several comments suggested that FDA adopt the reasonable substantiation standard used by the Federal Trade Commission
(FTC) (see FTC Policy Statement Regarding Advertising Substantiation Program (49 FR 30999, August 2, 1984)). The
comments asserted that under this policy, FDA could allow manufacturers to make claims provided that the nature of
the scientific finding is accurately represented, the degree of evidence is not misrepresented, and the claim passes
a rough cost/benefit test. The comments argued that this policy would facilitate harmonization with the FTC regulations
governing the use of health claims in food advertising, would allow consumers to have access to truthful, nonmisleading,
and reliable labeling information, and would still allow FDA to take action against those dietary supplements bearing
health claims that are not properly substantiated. 
Arguments that FDA should adopt for dietary supplements FTC's approach for regulating advertising are not consistent
with Congress' expectations for health claims. While the FTC and FDA are working together to achieve as much consistency
in their approaches to health claims as their respective statutes allow, adoption by FDA of the FTC advertising substantiation
approach would not provide FDA the confidence Congress intended concerning the scientific validity of the claims.
Specifically, as explained above, one of Congress' main purposes in passing the 1990 amendments was to ensure that
health claims made in food labeling are scientifically valid. No such assurance of scientific validity is provided
under the standard that FTC must employ. Under that standard, there must be some evidence to support a claim, but it
need not rise to the level of establishing the claim's validity. Thus, the FTC standard is not adequate for health claims.
In this context, it is appropriate to reiterate FDA's response to comments asserting that it was bound to follow cases
involving FTC's regulation of advertising in the preamble of the health claims final rule (58 FR 2478 at 2528):


Although cases involving FTC may sometimes be relevant, it is important to note that fundamental differences exist
between the regulatory schemes administered by the two agencies. Congress has long recognized the division of roles
between the two agencies_FTC concentrates on the interests of commerce and economic needs, whereas the objective
of FDA is ``the health of the people.'' FTC regulates unfair competition and trade practices, including food advertising.
(See, for example, 15 U.S.C. sections 45 and 52.) In contrast, FDA is a scientific agency empowered to regulate the
food label, among other things. Under section 403(r)(3)(B)(i) of the act, FDA may permit health claims on foods only
if it has determined that those claims meet the statutory test for scientific validity. The laws under which FTC operates
do not include a comparable statutory standard. Thus, it would not be appropriate for FDA to follow the case law involving
FTC. 


III. The Final Regulation


In light of the foregoing, FDA is subjecting dietary supplements to the same standard and procedure that applies to
food in conventional food form. The agency believes that this approach strikes the appropriate balance between the
congressional concern for consumer fraud, public health, and sound science, on the one hand, and the desire to provide
the consumer with information on the other. Thus, the agency is revising 101.14 and 101.70 to include
dietary supplements. 


A. Definitions


In the health claims proposal, FDA proposed definitions for ``health claim,'' ``substance,'' ``nutritive value,''
and ``dietary supplement'' to serve as tools for clearly establishing the scope of the types of claims that would be
subject to the regulations promulgated under section 403(r)(1)(B) of the act. In addition, the agency proposed a
definition for ``disqualifying nutrient levels'' to establish limits on the levels at which certain nutrients that
are known to increase the risk of a disease or health-related condition could be present in a food, and the food would
still be eligible to bear a health claim (see section 403(r)(3)(A)(ii) of the act). 
In the health claims final rule, the agency adopted definitions for the terms ``health claim,'' ``substance,'' ``nutritive
value,'' and ``disqualifying nutrient levels,'' that it revised in response either to comments or to the DS act (see
101.14(a)(1), (2), (3), and (5)). Also, FDA adopted a definition for the term ``disease or health-related
condition.'' Although the term is used in the definition of ``health claim,'' and the term serves to identify one of
the basic elements of a health claim, the agency had not proposed a definition for it. The agency added this definition
to clarify the coverage of the health claim provisions (see 101.14(a)(6)). Because of the DS act, the agency
reserved the question as to whether these definitions would apply to dietary supplements. The agency also did not
include a definition of ``dietary supplement'' in the final rule because of the moratorium imposed by the DS act. 
In the dietary supplement health claims proposal, FDA proposed to adopt the same regulatory scheme for health claims
for dietary supplements that it had established for foods in conventional food form. To effect this tentative decision,
the agency proposed to revise the definition of ``substance'' to make clear that it covers both food in conventional
food form and dietary supplements and to establish a definition for ``dietary supplement.''
FDA received no comments on the former aspect of the proposal. Therefore, the agency is adopting it as proposed. However,
FDA did receive some comments on its proposed definition of ``dietary supplement.'' 


1. Dietary Supplement


FDA proposed the following definition for the term ``dietary supplement'' (proposed 101.14(a)(4)):




Dietary supplement

 means a food, not in conventional food form, that supplies a component to supplement the diet by increasing the total
dietary intake of that component.


In the past, FDA has taken a position that the term ``dietary supplement'' applied only to supplements composed of
essential nutrients. However, FDA did not propose to limit the definition in 101.14(a) in this way because
section 403(r)(5)(D) of the act includes dietary supplements of herbs, substances that generally contain few essential
nutrients. In addition, the legislative history indicates that the term ``other nutritional substances'' could
include a number of substances that have not been shown to be essential or nutrients (Ref. 4). 
7. One comment commended the agency for proposing a definition of ``dietary supplement'' that recognized that these
foods could have components other than substances known to be essential nutrients. The comment asserted that the
proposed definition would appropriately move supplements out of the food additive category. 
FDA advises that the comment's assertion that the definition moves dietary supplements out of the food additive category
is not correct. A dietary supplement, as the definition recognizes, is a compounded food that may include compounds
that are food additives. Whether a component of food is a food additive or not is determined under section 201(s) of
the act (21 U.S.C. 321(s)), not section 403(r) of the act. Congress specifically provided in section 9 of the 1990 amendments
that these amendments ``shall not be construed to alter the authority of the Secretary of Health and Human Services
* * * under the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act.'' Thus, the components of dietary supplements that are food additives
are still fully subject to the food additive requirements under section 409 of the act.
8. A few comments requested that the proposed definition of ``dietary supplement'' be modified to explicitly include
all herbal extracts. One of these comments asserted that the definition should include ``processed or unprocessed
plant parts (bark, leaves, flowers, fruits, and stems) as well as extracts of essential oils, marketed as teas, powders,
tablets, capsules, and elixirs.'' 
FDA is adopting the definition of ``dietary supplement'' as proposed. This definition is intentionally broad to
cover the range of substances that, under the legislative history, could be included in a dietary supplement and could
be the subject of a health claim. The purpose of the definition of ``dietary supplement'' is not to define the substances
that may be eligible to be the subject of a health claim but to define the form in which they are to be sold to be subject
to regulation as a ``dietary supplement.'' Under the scheme that FDA is adopting, and that Congress envisioned (see
Ref. 4, statement of Senator Metzenbaum), the determination as to what substances are appropriately the subject
of a health claim is made on a case-by-case basis, based on the factors set out in 101.14(b) and the evidence presented
to the agency. The agency disagrees with the comment in one respect, however. Teas are food in conventional food form
and thus not included within the definition of ``dietary supplement.''
9. One comment asserted the definition of ``dietary supplement'' should include foods in conventional food form
that are fortified with a vitamin or mineral to a level of 50 percent or more of the Reference Daily Intake (RDI) per serving
(e.g., many breakfast cereals).
FDA does not agree that such foods should be included in the definition of ``dietary supplements.'' As discussed in
the preamble to the dietary supplement proposal (58 FR 33700 at 33707), FDA has limited this definition to foods not
in conventional food form to reflect the approach taken by Congress in the DS act. The manager's statements for the
DS act from the Senate and the House (Ref. 3) clearly state that the moratorium on the implementation of the 1990 amendments
applies only to dietary supplements ``not in the form of conventional food.'' Because foods in conventional food
form were not covered by the DS act moratorium, the health claims regulations already apply to them. Consequently,
FDA believes that it will reduce confusion about the impact of these regulations if the agency limits coverage of the
term ``dietary supplements'' to foods not in conventional food form. Of course, foods in conventional food form that
are formulated to supplement the dietary intake of nutrients will be free to reflect their characteristics in their
common or usual name (e.g., vitamin and mineral supplement cereal). 


2. Nutritive Value


In the health claims final rule, FDA defined ``nutritive value'' as follows: 



Nutritive value 

 means a value in sustaining human existence by such processes as promoting growth, replacing loss of essential nutrients,
or providing energy.


Although FDA did not propose any changes in the definition of ``nutritive value'' in the dietary supplement health
claims proposal, many comments expressed concern about the impact of this definition in conjunction with the preliminary
requirement in 101.14(b)(3)(i) that the substance that is the subject of a health claim contribute taste,
aroma, or nutritive value, or any technical effect listed in 170(o), and that the substance must retain that
attribute when consumed at levels that are necessary to justify a claim. (Preliminary requirements are criteria
in 101.14(b) that have to be met before a substance will qualify to be the subject of a health claim. An indepth
discussion of all preliminary requirements follows in section III.B. of this document.) 
10. Some comments urged the agency to broaden its definition of ``nutritive value.'' These comments urged the agency
to recognize that the processes by which a nutrient promotes health, maintains proper bodily functioning, and protects
the body from the development of chronic disease or other health-related conditions are, in and of themselves, characteristic
of ``nutritive value.'' The comments noted that the basic function of Vitamin E, for example, relates to its antioxidant
properties in preventing cell damage by trapping peroxyl free radicals and inhibiting the oxidation of unsaturated
fatty acids. Also, the comments pointed out that fiber does not promote growth, replace essential nutrients, or provide
energy, but that Congress specifically required FDA to study the relationship between various diseases and fiber.
Some of the comments asked that the phrase ``preventing or repairing the negative metabolic consequences of life
processes'' be added to the list of processes that characterize the nutritive value of a food to ensure that such components
can be the subject of health claims. A few comments asserted that FDA should revise the definition of ``nutritive value''
to provide for claims about ``prevention'' of a disease or health-related condition. 
However, one comment maintained that the definition of ``nutritive value'' in 101.14(a)(3) is broad enough
to include the functions of most dietary supplements. The comment supported its position by agreeing with FDA's statement
in the health claims final rule (58 FR 2478 at 2488) that the inclusion of the phrase ``such as'' in the definition ensures
that the three referenced processes are examples of how a substance may confer nutritive value rather than as an all-inclusive
list. 
The comment that highlighted FDA's use of the phrase ``such processes as'' in this definition is correct. FDA intended
the three referenced processes to be examples of how a substance may confer nutritive value rather than as an all-inclusive
list of the functions that provide such value. As FDA explained in the health claims final rule (58 FR 2478 at 2488),
the definition of ``nutritive value'' is intended to be very flexible. The agency incorporated this flexibility
in the definition because FDA recognizes that certain substances can play a major role in reducing the risk of certain
chronic diseases and may confer their benefits through a number of processes. FDA believes that the agency should
evaluate the nutritive value claimed for a substance that is proposed as the subject of a health claim, as described
in a health claim petition, on a case-by-case basis. This approach will best ensure that the definition retains its
intended flexibility and does not become an unintentional barrier to authorization for legitimate health claims.

FDA does believe, however, that this preamble should provide guidance concerning how the agency will determine if
a claimed nutrient-disease relationship derives from the nutritive value of a substance. In general, the agency
will look for evidence that the claimed effect on disease is associated with the normal maintenance of human existence.
If the substance is used to correct an abnormal physiological function caused by a disease or health-related condition,
the action of the substance is clearly beyond a normal maintenance function, and the health benefit would therefore
not derive from the substance's nutritive value. Such a substance would be a drug. (Note also that claims about classical
nutrient deficiency diseases are not health claims (see 58 FR 2478 at 2481).) 
FDA recognizes that many of the benefits mentioned in the comments may derive from the nutritional value of a substance.
The agency's broad definition of ``nutritive value'' includes assisting in the efficient functioning of classical
nutritional processes and of other metabolic processes necessary for the normal maintenance of human existence.
Dietary fiber, for example, helps to assure normal intestinal transit time, thereby providing nutritional value
by promoting efficient bowel function. Vitamin E provides nutritive value through its antioxidant function of reduction
of cell damage.
With respect to assertions that FDA should revise the definition of ``nutritive value'' to provide for claims about
``prevention'' of a disease or health-related condition, the agency points out that the preamble of the health claims
final rule (58 FR 2478 at 2501 through 2502) fully addressed this matter and concluded that a claim that a substance
can be used in the prevention, diagnosis, cure, mitigation, or treatment of a disease or symptom is inappropriate
for a food (see section 201(g)(1)(B) of the act and 101.9(k)(1) (21 U.S.C. 101.9(k)(1))). FDA reached this
conclusion because the relationship of a food or a food component to a disease is quite different from that of a drug.
The comments making these assertions did not provide any basis upon which FDA could conclude that the agency's position
in this matter should be different for dietary supplements than for foods in conventional food form. As FDA explained
in the preamble of the health claims final rule, the Surgeon General's Report on Nutrition and Health (Ref. 5) points
out that, apart from classic disorders resulting from dietary deficiencies of essential nutrients (e.g., pellagra
and niacin), it has proved difficult to demonstrate causal associations between specific dietary factors and chronic
or other diseases (e.g., dietary fiber and cancer). The report states:


Development of the major chronic disease conditions_coronary heart disease, stroke, diabetes, or cancer_is affected
by multiple genetic, environmental, and behavioral factors among which diet is only one_albeit an important_component.
These other factors interact with diet in ways that are not completely understood. In addition, foods themselves
are complex; they may contain some factors that promote disease as well as others that are protective. The relationship
of dietary fat intake to causation of atherosclerotic heart disease is a prominent example. An excess intake of total
fat, if characterized by high saturated fat, is associated with high blood cholesterol levels and therefore an increased
risk for coronary heart disease in many populations. A higher proportion of mono- and polyunsaturated fats in relation
to saturated fats is associated with lower blood cholesterol levels and, therefore, with a reduced risk for coronary
heart disease.
Because of these complexities, definitive scientific proof that specific dietary factors are responsible for specific
chronic disease conditions is difficult_and may not be possible_to obtain, given available technology. 


(Ref. 5).


11. Several comments argued that the definition of ``nutritive value'' should include levels of nutrients that are
achievable only through the use of fortified foods or dietary supplements. Several of these comments referenced
studies recently reported in the New England Journal of Medicine that indicate that vitamin E reduces the risk of heart
disease when consumed at levels that are almost impossible to achieve through a conventional diet but that can be easily
and safely attained through the use of dietary supplements. These comments asserted that it would be inappropriate
for FDA to categorize the involved nutrient levels of vitamin E as therapeutic and to refuse to consider approving
a health claim simply because the claim concerns levels of a nutrient above that achievable in a normal daily diet.
A few of the comments supported this assertion by noting that the mechanism by which Vitamin E protects against cell
damage when consumed at normal dietary levels is identical to the mechanism by which it protects against heart disease
when consumed at higher levels. The comments maintained that, in cases such as this one, the agency should approve
health claims for use strictly on dietary supplements, provided that the nutrient is safe when consumed at the level
at which the claimed effect is achieved, and the supplement is intended to be consumed to optimize health rather than
as a drug. The comments supported this regulatory approach by noting that the health benefits of calcium occur when
the nutrient is consumed at increased levels that can be achieved through the diet or by supplementation and stating
that vitamin E should not be treated differently simply because the beneficial levels cannot be reached without the
use of dietary supplements. 
Similar comments argued that FDA should at least avoid establishing a maximum level of a nutrient that is considered
to be characteristic of ``nutritive value.'' One of these comments noted such an approach results in an extremely
fuzzy line, because the maximum level of a nutrient that is achievable in a diet varies widely from one individual to
another. As an example, the comment pointed out that a person who eats ten oranges or drinks a quart of orange juice per
day gets more vitamin C than is provided by most currently marketed vitamin C supplements. A few comments asserted
that there is much scientific disagreement over what levels of a nutrient are ``nutritive,'' with many scientists
contending that levels much higher than the U.S. Recommended Daily Allowances (U.S. RDA) fall within the definition.
A few comments requested that FDA explicitly express in its regulations a policy that nutritive value may involve
relatively high levels of a nutrient. 
A few comments maintained that FDA should presume that all nutrients function in a nutritive manner regardless of
their level, unless it has proof to the contrary. In support of this position, a number of comments objected to the use
of niacin's effect on blood cholesterol levels in the dietary supplement proposal as an example of an effect that is
not nutritive. One of these comments questioned FDA's assertion that niacin does not exhibit cholesterol-reducing
properties when ingested at the levels conventionally associated with its function as a vitamin. The comment stated
that niacin's vitamin effect occurs below the level of tissue saturation and maintained that the excretion of niacin
when consumed at higher levels known to be associated with cholesterol-lowering effects does not necessarily indicate
that tissue saturation has occurred. This comment also disagreed with the agency's statement that the occurrence
of liver damage when high levels of niacin are consumed indicates that the effect of niacin at these levels is not nutritive
in nature. The comment argued that it is quite possible that niacin continues to have nutritive effects at these levels
but simply is overloading the body's normal metabolic pathways for ridding itself of excessive levels of the nutrient.
The comment asserted that while legitimate safety concerns exist in particular cases of excessive nutrient intake,
FDA should not use this fact to conclude that high levels of those nutrients are inherently nonnutritive in nature
and are instead pharmacological. 
Other comments expressed the belief that nothing in the proposed regulations would automatically exclude high levels
of nutrients from the definition of ``nutritive value'' and urged the agency to include such levels in instances where
they would benefit the public health. These comments also agreed with FDA's decision to review on a case-by-case basis
whether the amount of a substance is appropriate as the subject of a health claim. One of these comments stated that
such an approach would help to ensure that health information about fortified foods and dietary supplements can be
conveyed without triggering the drug regulations. 
FDA does not believe that it is necessary for the rules to explicitly state that nutritive value includes relatively
high levels of a nutrient. As some comments pointed out, the case-by-case approach, which, as stated above, is intrinsically
linked with the preliminary requirement in the provisions of 
101.14(b)(3)(i), provides the agency with considerable flexibility with respect to high levels of substances
in dietary supplements. Under this approach, FDA has not, as a general rule, established any maximum level at which
a nutrient would cease to have ``nutritive value.'' Furthermore, the agency advises that there is no basis for concerns
that FDA would use safety concerns alone to conclude that high levels of nutrients are pharmacological. FDA will not
do so.
As some of the comments pointed out, petitions for claims that require that high levels of substances be ingested should
have no problem demonstrating that the substance has nutritive value where the mechanism by which the substance affects
the risk of disease at these high levels is the same as the mechanism by which it functions as a nutrient at normal dietary
levels. However, it will still be necessary, as the agency explained in response to the previous comment, for the petition
to show that the substance's effect on disease is associated with the normal functioning of the human body (e.g., the
substance could not be used to correct an abnormal physiological function caused by a disease or health-related condition.)

In its response to the previous comment, the agency acknowledged that vitamin E provides nutritive value through
its antioxidant function of reduction of cell damage. If there are situations where it can be established that this
same antioxidant mechanism affects the risk of disease when the vitamin is consumed at levels significantly higher
than normal dietary levels, such levels would satisfy the requirement in 101.14(b)(3)(i) that a substance
retain its food attribute (i.e., its nutritive value) when consumed at levels that are necessary to justify a claim.

FDA does not agree, however, that it should presume that all nutrients function in a nutritive manner, regardless
of their level, unless it has proof to the contrary. It would not be practicable for the agency to bear the burden of determining
the mechanism by which the claimed effect is occurring for each petitioned claim. Thus, the agency finds that it is
appropriate to require that petitioners provide the basis for why it is reasonable to conclude that the claimed effect
is nutritional and not pharmacological. However, the agency does not necessarily expect absolute proof on this issue.
FDA will evaluate petitions on this issue on a case-by-case basis. 
The agency has considered assertions that the dietary supplement proposal should not have cited the cholesterol-reducing
properties of niacin as an example of a high dose effect that is not nutritive. FDA has again concluded that niacin is
an appropriate example because there are significant indications that a nutritive mechanism is not responsible
for the cholesterol-lowering effect that occurs with high levels of niacin intake. When FDA stated in the dietary
supplement proposal that levels of niacin necessary to produce the cholesterol-lowering effect are far in excess
of the levels at which there is tissue saturation for niacin's vitamin function, the agency was attempting to explain
that for niacin's function as a vitamin there is a level beyond which additional niacin will not provide additional
functional results for that vitamin. The term ``tissue saturation'' may imply either this type of situation (sometimes
referred to as ``function saturation'') or the type of situation referred to in one of the comments wherein the tissue
is saturated with a concentration of a substance, and more substance could immediately spill out into the urine. FDA
was not attempting to assert that the tissue itself was actually saturated. There is no question that additional niacin
will be absorbed by cells when the vitamin function saturation level is reached. 
In addition to the situation with vitamin function saturation, there are other indications that the cholesterol-reducing
properties of niacin do not result from the same mechanism as that presented by its vitamin function. Vitamin function
saturation may be achieved through dietary supplementation with either of the two forms of the vitamin, nicotinic
acid or nicotinamide. However, only nicotinic acid provides, at high levels, the cholesterol-reducing effects.
Such effects do not appear with high level consumption of nicotinamide (Ref. 6). If the same mechanism were involved
with the vitamin function of niacin as with the cholesterol-reducing properties of niacin, both forms of this vitamin
should have cholesterol-reducing properties. 


3. Health Claim


In the dietary supplement health claim proposal, FDA did not propose to make any modifications in the definition of
``health claim'' in 101.14(a)(1):


Health claim means any claim made on the label or in labeling of a food, including a dietary supplement, that expressly
or by implication, including ``third party'' references, written statements (e.g., a brand name including a term
such as ``heart''), symbols (e.g., a heart symbol), or vignettes, characterizes the relationship of any substance
to a disease or health-related condition. Implied health claims include those statements, symbols, vignettes,
or other forms of communication that suggest, within the context in which they are presented, that a relationship
exists between the presence or level of any substance in the food and a disease or health-related condition.
Nonetheless, FDA received several comments on this definition.


12. Some comments asserted that FDA should clarify the types of statements that will be regulated as health claims.
A few of these comments asked whether statements that indicate that a product may be useful in maintaining good health
(e.g., ``Substance X may be beneficial to good health'') or that describe the biochemical functions of vitamins,
minerals, and other nutrients (e.g., ``Vitamin A is necessary for good eyesight,'' ``Protein helps build a strong
body'') will be considered to be health claims. The comments objected to FDA's failure to provide clear instruction
in this regard. These comments asserted that the agency's allowance of case-by-case interpretation of the regulations
will hinder industry compliance, create enforcement problems for the agency, and cause continued antagonism between
FDA and the food industry. 
FDA believes that it provided ample guidance on what types of statements constitute health claims in the health claims
final rule. As the agency explained in the preamble of that rule (58 FR 2478 at 2479 through 2488), the definition establishes
that a claim must have at least two basic elements for it to be regulated as a ``health claim.'' First, the claim must
be about a ``substance'' as defined in 101.14(a)(2). Secondly, the claim must characterize the relationship
of that substance to a ``disease or health-related condition,'' as defined in 101.14(a)(6): 




Disease or health-related condition

 means damage to an organ, part, structure, or system of the body such that it does not function properly (e.g., cardiovascular
disease), or a state of health leading to such dysfunctioning (e.g., hypertension); except that diseases resulting
from essential nutrient deficiencies (e.g., scurvy, pellagra) are not included in this definition (claims pertaining
to such diseases are thereby not subject to 101.14 or 101.70).
If a statement has one of these elements without the other, it would not be a ``health claim,'' although it may still
be subject to regulation under other provisions of the act (e.g., the requirement of section 403(a)(1) of the act that
a label statement be truthful and not misleading). Thus, all of the statements mentioned by the comments would not
be health claims because they do not address a disease or health-related condition as defined under 101.14(a)(6).
The agency has provided a lengthy and detailed discussion on what types of statements constitute health claims in
the health claims final rule at the pages cited above.


12. A few comments asked whether FDA would remove or prohibit the publishing of books containing information on health
claims and argued that such regulations would clearly be unconstitutional. Other comments addressed the issue of
whether FDA's health claims regulations for dietary supplements would apply to advertising. One of these comments
interpreted an excerpt from the report of FDA's Task Force on Dietary Supplements as an attempt to disallow the use
of unapproved health claims in magazines, newsletters, or other media channels unless the information has been preapproved
by FDA. That excerpt reads:


The task force considered various issues in its deliberations, including how to assure the safety of dietary supplements;
how to limit the potential for fraud, i.e., disease claims made on labels or through other means, e.g., magazine articles,
newsletters, and advertisements * * *.


The comment further asserted that this same intent is reflected in the health claim regulations proposed in November
1991. The comment stated that this broad-based application of the health claims regulations would severely jeopardize
the reporting of health and disease-related information in almost every form of media, would inhibit the evolution
of scientific knowledge, would have a significant negative impact on the public health of America, and was likely
unconstitutional.
FDA advises that the provisions of this regulation pertain only to a product's label and labeling. This regulation
does nothing to censor the content of books, magazines, or advertising. This regulation also does not in any way regulate
the availability of books, magazines, or advertising. However, firms sometimes choose to use such material as labeling
for their products, and if used as such, the material would be subject to this regulation. For example, sometimes firms
copy an article from a magazine and display that article with a product that is offered for sale. Under such circumstances,
the article would be a part of the labeling of that product. What is significant to note is that these regulations in
no way limit what articles may be published, or what books may be printed. They limit only the claims that may be made
in the labeling of food products. Under the act, advertising may provide objective evidence of what the intended use
of a particular product is. If the advertising reveals that the product is intended to be used as a drug, the product
may be regulated as a drug. In addition, claims made in advertising may affect the type of nutrition labeling that is
provided (see 101.9(j)). Claims made in advertising, however, are not subject to section 403(r)(1)(B) of
the act. 
Thus, the agency finds no merit in the concerns expressed by these comments.


B. Preliminary Requirements for a Claim


In the health claims final rule, FDA established several criteria in 101.14(b) that have to be met before a substance
will qualify to be the subject of a health claim. The criteria provide that the substance must: (1) Be associated with
a disease or health-related condition for which the general U.S. population is at risk (alternatively, the relevance
of the claim may be explained within the context of the daily diet) (see 
101.14(b)(1)); (2) be a food (see 101.14(b)(2) and (b)(3)(i)); and (3) be safe and lawful under applicable
food safety provisions of the act (see 101.14(b)(3)(ii)). These criteria reflect not only the requirements
of section 403(r) of the act but also the fact that FDA is charged with ensuring that the food supply is safe, and that
the food label is not misleading. Given that agency evaluations of the validity of a health claim will be resource intensive,
FDA decided not to undertake such evaluations unless a petition for a health claim demonstrates that the preliminary
requirements are met. While FDA had proposed in November of 1991 that these preliminary requirements cover substances
in dietary supplements as well as foods in conventional food form, the provisions of the DS act precluded the agency
from applying these preliminary requirements to substances in dietary supplements at the time that the rule was finalized.
Thus, the preliminary requirements established in the health claims final rule apply only to substances in foods
in conventional food form. 
The dietary supplement health claim proposal contained provisions to subject the components of dietary supplements
to the same preliminary requirements in 101.14(b) that apply to any other substance that is proposed as the
subject of a health claim. This final rule for dietary supplements retains these provisions as proposed. Specific
reference to dietary supplements in 101.14(b)(1) and (b)(2) is not necessary because the requirements in
these paragraphs apply generally to any ``substance,'' and FDA's revision of the definition of ``substance'' in
101.14(a)(2) includes the components of dietary supplements within the coverage of this term. However, FDA
proposed to add a specific reference to dietary supplements to paragraph (b)(3)(i) of 101.14 to clarify that
the substance may be a component of a food that is in the form of a dietary supplement. The only comments on the issue agreed
with the agency's proposed revision. Accordingly, as proposed, FDA is including in the final regulations a reference
to dietary supplements in the codified language of 101.14(b)(3)(i). Specifically, FDA is inserting the phrase
``regardless of whether the food is in conventional food form or dietary supplement form'' into 101.14(b)(3)(i).



1. Effect on General Population


13. One comment argued that the proposed requirement that a substance be associated with a disease or health-related
condition for which the general U.S. population or a subpopulation thereof is at risk, or that the claim be explained
within the context of the daily diet, would prohibit the appearance of health claims on herbal dietary supplements.
However, the comment did not explain how the requirement would have this effect, and the comment's own analysis of
how garlic would or would not meet various proposed requirements indicated that garlic would meet this particular
requirement. 
FDA does not agree that this preliminary requirement will present any significant barriers to the appearance of health
claims on dietary supplements. To the contrary, as the agency explained in the preamble of the health claims final
rule (58 FR 2478 at 2499), FDA intends to employ a flexible approach in interpreting this provision. The alternative
aspect of the provision, which creates the possibility of claims about the relationship of a substance to a disease
or health related-condition that affects very few in the U.S. population as long as the petition in support of the claim
addresses that fact and the relevance of the claim in the context of the total daily diet, evidences a determination
by FDA to provide the widest latitude possible for proposed claims to qualify under this provision. 
14. One comment requested that FDA not limit the diseases or health-related conditions that may be the subject of a
health claim to those for which the entire United States is at potential risk. The comment asserted that health claims
should also be allowed in cases where dietary factors have been conclusively shown to affect diseases or health-related
conditions for which only a particular subportion of the U.S. population is at risk (e.g., ovarian cancer in women).

FDA advises that the general eligibility provisions of its health claims regulations in 101.14(b)(1) do not
contain the restriction cited by the comment. While these provisions contain a requirement that health claims pertain
to diseases or health-related conditions affecting the general U.S. population, they also provide that health claims
may pertain to diseases or health-related conditions for which an identified subgroup of the U.S. population is at
risk. Thus, ovarian cancer in women would clearly be an appropriate subject of a health claim. 


2. Components of Food Within the Context of a Daily Diet


The preliminary requirement that a substance that is to be the subject of a health claim must be a food appears in 
101.14(b)(2) and (b)(3)(i). If the substance is present at decreased dietary levels, under 101.14(b)(2),
it must be a nutrient that is required to be included in nutrition labeling (e.g., cholesterol, total fat). If the substance
is present at other than decreased dietary levels, under 101.14(b)(3)(i), it: (1) Must contribute taste,
aroma, or nutritive value, or any other technical effect listed in 170.3(o), to the food and (2) must retain
that attribute when consumed at levels that are necessary to justify a claim. 
15. Numerous comments expressed concern about the aspect of the preliminary requirement of 101.14(b)(3)(i)
that requires that a substance contribute taste, aroma, or nutritive value, or any technical effect listed in 170.3(o),
in view of the agency's definition of ``nutritive value'' in 101.14(a)(3). A number of these comments characterized
these provisions as an attack by the agency against dietary supplements. Some comments asserted that the proposed
preliminary requirement would prohibit dietary supplements, especially those containing herbs, from bearing
health claims. Comments pointed out that many herbs, such as garlic, are specially processed to remove the flavor
or odor from the final supplement product. A number of comments explained that such supplements would fail to meet
this requirement because their beneficial effects on the body often are derived from substances unique to the plant
that do not promote growth, replace loss of essential nutrients, or provide energy. A few comments also noted that
many herbs contain insignificant amounts of vitamins, minerals, and other nutrients. 
Some comments asserted that the adoption of any preliminary requirement that would automatically disqualify herbal
dietary supplements from bearing health claims would undermine the intent of Congress to establish a nondrug review
process for health claims involving herbs. These comments asserted that the 1990 amendments clearly provide that
herbal dietary supplements can be the topic of a health claim. Furthermore, a comment asserted that the Court of Appeals
held in 

Nutrilab, Inc.

 v. 

Schweiker

, 713 F.2d 335, 338 (7th Cir. 1983) that some products, such as prune juice or coffee, may be consumed for reasons other
than taste, aroma, or nutritive value.
One comment asserted that all dietary supplements already meet the this preliminary requirement. The comment noted
that a substance to be consumed at other than decreased dietary levels may also be shown to be a food by contributing
any technical effect listed in 170.3(o). The comment stated that 170.3(o)(20) lists one of those technical
effects as nutrient supplementation and broadly defines a ``nutrient supplement'' as ``substances which are necessary
for the body's nutritional and metabolic processes.''
FDA does not believe that it is overly restrictive to require, as it does in 101.14(b)(3)(i), that a substance
be a food or a component of food for it to be the subject of a health claim. Section 403 of the act, which includes the health
claims provisions, states, ``A food shall be deemed to be misbranded * * *'' (emphasis added). Thus, section 403(r)
of the act describes the circumstances in which a food will, and will not be, misbranded if it bears a health claim. It
is therefore appropriate for the agency to make it incumbent on the proponent of a health claim to demonstrate that
the substance that is to be the subject of the claim is a food or component of food. 
FDA disagrees with the comments' interpretation of the 

Nutrilab

 decision. As FDA explained in the preamble of the health claims final rule (58 FR 2478 at 24992500), the 

Nutrilab

 court adopted a ``common sense'' definition of ``food'' under section 201(f)(1) of the act: ``When the statute defines
`food' as `articles used for food,' it means that the statutory definition of `food' includes articles used by people
in the ordinary way most people use food_primarily for taste, aroma, or nutritive value.'' 

Nutrilab

, 713 F.2d at 338. Other courts have followed suit. 

See

 

United States

 v. 

Undetermined Quantities of Cal-Ban 3000

, 776 F. Supp. 249, 25455 (E.D.N.C. 1991); 

American Health Products Co.

 v. 

Hayes

, 574 F. Supp. 1498, 150809 (S.D.N.Y. 1983), 

aff'd

, 744 F.2d 912 (2d Cir. 1984). By describing taste, aroma, and nutritive value as the ``primary'' reasons for consuming
food, the 

Nutrilab

 court acknowledged that a food consumed for one of these reasons might sometimes also be consumed for an additional
purpose (713 F.2d at 338 (giving prune juice and coffee as examples of foods that ``may be consumed on occasion for reasons
other than taste, aroma, or nutritive value'')). Under 

Nutrilab

, however, a substance whose uses do not include taste, aroma, or nutritive value is not a food.
In 101.14(b)(3)(i), FDA incorporated this common sense definition of food and the phrase ``or any technical
effect listed in 170.3(o),'' which reflects the fact that the definition of ``food'' in section 201(f)(3)
of the act includes ``articles used for components of food,'' as a preliminary requirement to ensure that a substance
that is to be the subject of a health claim is in fact a food. This preliminary requirement is fundamental because both
the component of a food that is the subject of a health claim and a component of a drug have a characterizable relationship
to a disease. Congress recognized this fact by creating an exception from section 201(g)(1)(B) of the act, in the definition
of ``drug'' for foods that bear a claim authorized under section 403(r) of the act. Thus, it is crucial to the continuing
viability of the act itself that the choice of the test that determines whether a claim that characterizes the relationship
of a substance to a disease can be made be based on the appropriate factors. Under the act, that choice turns in part on
whether the substance is a food. Therefore, FDA has reflected in 101.14(b)(3)(i) the judicially recognized
characteristics of a food.
In this regard, interested persons should not presume that inclusion of the phrase ``or any technical effect listed
in 
170.3(o)'' in 101.14(b)(3)(i) means that substances that may be classified within one or more of the
categories of food additives in 170.3(o) automatically meet this preliminary requirement. The classifications
within 170.3(o) are of a general nature to reflect the uses to which food ingredients are put. All of the classifications
pertain to the effect of the ingredients on food (e.g., by affecting the texture of the food) rather than on the human
body. Only a substance that is used for the technical effect in 170.3(o)(20), that of a nutrient supplement,
has the potential to have a useful effect in the body because of the characteristics that cause it to be used in the food.
The ``nutrient supplement'' category includes ``Substances which are necessary for the body's nutritional and
metabolic processes.'' As the comments themselves recognized, not every component of a dietary supplement has such
an effect.
In view of the agency's broad, flexible definition of ``nutritive value,'' FDA does not find any merit in arguments
that the provisions requiring that a substance be a food should be removed. To the contrary, FDA believes that these
provisions will benefit the public health by allowing the agency to devote its limited resources for review of petitions
to those that are appropriate for consideration under the health claim provisions of the act. Accordingly, FDA considers
these provisions essential elements under the framework that it has created in its regulations for the regulation
of health claims and fully consistent with the act. 
FDA disagrees with the comments' characterization of its actions as an attack against dietary supplements. FDA believes
that the combined effect of 101.14(b)(3)(i), the preliminary requirement that a substance be a food, and 101.14(a)(3),
the definition of ``nutritive value,'' will not present dietary supplements with any unreasonable barriers for
agency evaluation of potential health claims for components of these products. Without question, these provisions
do restrict health claims to effects on a disease or a health-related condition resulting from the nutritive value
of substances. However, as one comment pointed out, the current definition of ``nutritive value'' in 101.14(a)(3)
is broad enough to include the functions of most dietary supplements.
One observation that might bear making in this context is that Congress has given the agency a statutory structure
with which to deal. In relevant part, that structure divides the world of substances that have a relationship to disease
into foods and drugs. Congress placed the health claims provisions on the food side of the ledger. FDA is charged with
implementing those provisions in accordance with the act and applicable legal precedents. FDA has announced its
intention to implement the health claim provisions as flexibly as possible, but at some point the agency simply cannot
be as flexible as some of the comments have suggested. At that point, the agency would start to erode the scheme that
the statute has established for drugs. The agency cannot do that. If Congress intended something that goes beyond
the scheme that FDA has established in these final regulations, then what is required is a change in the law itself.
16. Many comments objected to the aspect of 101.14(b)(3)(i) that requires that a substance retain its food
status (i.e., its nutritive value) when consumed at levels that are necessary to justify a claim. Almost all concern
was directed toward consumption of substances at levels significantly higher than those present in the daily diet.
Some comments urged FDA to evaluate proposed health claims involving relatively high levels of nutrients on the grounds
that categorically prohibiting them would deny Americans beneficial information rather than educating them on
how to alter their diets to achieve optimal health. Other comments stated that FDA's categorical refusal to evaluate
such health claims because of the nutrient levels involved would directly violate both the Proxmire Amendment and
the congressional intent behind the 1990 amendments. These comments noted that the 1990 amendments provide for the
appearance of health claims on foods and stated that, subject to certain conditions, the Proxmire Amendment's prohibition
against regulating a vitamin supplement as a drug ``solely because it exceeds the level of potency which the Secretary
determines is nutritionally rational or useful'' guarantees the regulation of vitamins as foods regardless of the
levels of nutrients that they supply. The comments also stated that Congress envisioned the approval of such health
claims, as it was aware that dietary supplements substantially in excess of the U.S. RDA's were routinely being consumed
by Americans, and it chose to direct that FDA conduct a review of antioxidant vitamins/cancer claims with dietary
supplements in mind. Other comments further asserted that FDA was attempting to circumvent the Proxmire Amendment
and create maximum potency levels for all supplements by establishing an upper limit for ``nutritive value.'' 
FDA does not agree that any conflict with section 411 of the act is presented by a requirement that, to be the subject
of a health claim, the substance must be a food, that is, consumed primarily for its taste, aroma, or nutritive value.
There is nothing in the health claims final rule or in the regulations established by this document that will affect
in any way the availability of dietary supplements or consumers' freedom to choose to purchase them. Rather, the regulations
that FDA is establishing are intended to ensure that any health claims that may be made for dietary supplements are
scientifically valid. This is what section 403(r)(5)(D) of the act directs FDA to do.
Nothing in these regulations would necessarily prevent a supplement from bearing a health claim when it contains
a level of a substance that exceeds the level achievable in the context of the daily diet. To the contrary, the final
rule concerning calcium and osteoporosis, for example, which was published in the 

Federal Register

 of January 6, 1993 (58 FR 2665), permits a calcium health claim for dietary supplements and requires only that the supplement
labeling advise consumers, in appropriate circumstances, that there is no known benefit from consuming more than
200 percent of the recommended daily intake for calcium. 
Section 411 of the act does not authorize health claims for dietary supplements or in any way affect FDA's authority
under section 403(r)(5)(D) of the act to regulate such claims. Under section 411(a)(1)(B) of the act, FDA may not classify
a dietary supplement as a drug solely because it contains a vitamin or mineral at a level that exceeds the level of potency
that the agency determines is nutritionally rational or useful. Nothing in these proposed regulations would do so.
Absent a claim, FDA will not consider a dietary supplement to be a drug because it contains vitamins or minerals at levels
above those normally found in food. However, a claim on a product is an indication of the product's intended use. If
a claim reveals that the product is intended for a use other than for its taste, aroma, or nutritive value, then nothing
in section 411 of the act would require that it be treated as a food. 
17. Many comments addressed the circumstances under which dietary supplements should be considered drugs. A number
of these comments referred to the following agency statement in the health claims final rule (comment 49, 58 FR 2478
at 2501): 


A product that is intended for medicinal effects, that is, intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment,
or prevention of disease, is a drug and not a food. Thus, there is no basis under the act for FDA to permit health claims
for herbs whose only known use is for medicinal effects. Health benefits of such herbs may appear in the labeling only
in accordance with the drug provisions of the act. 


Although a few comments agreed with this statement, many comments expressed categorical opposition to the classification
of any herbs or other dietary supplements as drugs. While most of these comments did not offer reasons in support of
their position, one comment expressed concern that such a policy would be grounds for FDA to categorically ban all
such supplements as unapproved new drugs. Several comments noted that many herbs have traditionally been used both
as foods and drugs and asked for assurance that FDA would not automatically regulate such herbs as drugs. Other comments
argued that herbs should always be regulated as foods where they are consumed for their nutritive value. 
Some comments stressed that intended use, as stated on its labeling, should be the determinative factor in deciding
whether a supplement should be regulated as a food or as a drug. As an example, one of these comments stated that a supplement
marketed for a specific therapeutic use (e.g., a vitamin C tablet sold to cure cancer) is appropriately regarded as
a drug, while a supplement sold to be taken over a period of time to reduce the risk of developing a disease (e.g., a vitamin
C tablet sold to be taken daily to reduce the risk of cancer) should be regulated as a food. The comment asserted that
this approach is consistent with FDA's determination that a supplement containing large amounts of niacin should
be regulated as a drug when consumed to lower serum cholesterol. Another of these comments emphasized that a consumer's
use of a legally labeled product should not have any weight in determining whether that product is a drug. As an example,
the comment noted that FDA does not regulate either fiber or water as a drug as long as their labeling does not bear drug
claims, even though consumers may use them to facilitate bowel movement or to prevent, mitigate, or treat 
dehydration, respectively. 
A few comments suggested that FDA determine whether a substance is a food or a drug by its chemical composition. The
comments asserted that while the boundary between drugs and supplements is fuzzy at times, drugs are typically synthetic
molecules that are of a unique and patentable nature, while dietary supplements consist of natural, nonpatentable
materials.
Another comment stated that FDA should exempt substances taken to treat a symptom of a disease from regulation as drugs,
as the act defines as drugs only those substances used in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention
of the disease itself. 
Earlier in this preamble, FDA explained that these regulations do not affect the availability of dietary supplements.
Again, these regulations affect only the food label and food labeling. FDA has no intention of banning all dietary
supplements of herbs or similar substances as unapproved new drugs. FDA will carry out its responsibility to regulate
inappropriate claims, but the agency will not attempt to restrict the sale of dietary supplements to consumers unless
the supplements present safety concerns.
With respect to the specific words for use in labeling statements, FDA advises that statements that a product may be
effective in the cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease will make the product a drug. However, statements
that a product may reduce the risk of developing a disease or health-related condition may, or may not, make the product
a drug. Exactly how a substance-disease relationship is to be characterized is one of the issues that the agency will
address in deciding whether to authorize a health claim and how to ensure that the claim describes the significance
of the substance in affecting the disease or health-related condition. FDA points out that as a general matter, merely
using terms such as ``reduce the risk'' instead of ``prevent'' will not automatically make a claim a health claim and
not a drug claim. FDA will make a case-by-case assessment based on all relevant factors in determining whether a claim
is appropriately subject to the health claims regime. The agency also agrees that the main focus in deciding whether
a product is subject to regulation as a food or a drug is the intent of the vendor and not how consumers use the product
(although how consumers understand claims that are made can be used to determine vendor intent). 
FDA advises that there is no provision in the act for the agency to exempt statements about symptoms of disease from
causing products to be regulated as drugs. Although such statements may not be claims that the product will treat the
disease that causes the symptoms, the statements clearly pertain to the mitigation of disease by addressing the symptoms
caused by the disease. Section 201(g)(1)(B) of the act provides, in part, that articles intended for use in the mitigation
of disease are drugs. Similarly, there is no provision in the act for FDA to exempt natural, nonpatentable materials
from the definition of a drug in section 201(g) of the act. 
FDA advises that it not true that all natural materials are not drugs. It has been estimated that about 25 percent of
the drugs currently prescribed by physicians are plant compounds, and that an additional 25 percent are related to
plants. Therefore, fully half of the drugs commonly used can be considered plant derived. Such commonly used drugs
as digitalis, aspirin, quinidine, atropine, and hundreds of others were once considered herbals. Thus, the agency
finds that it cannot rely on the distinction of whether a product is natural or synthetic in deciding whether it is a
food or a drug. 


3. Safety


Section 101.14(b)(3)(ii) provides that, to justify a claim for a substance that is to be consumed at other than decreased
levels, the substance must be a food or a food ingredient or a component of a food ingredient whose use at the levels necessary
to justify a claim has been demonstrated by the proponent of the claim, to FDA's satisfaction, to be safe and lawful
under the applicable food safety provisions of the act.
The preamble of the dietary supplement health claims proposal (58 FR 33700 at 33709) explained:


* * * This showing can be based on: (1) A demonstration that the substance is generally recognized as safe (GRAS) within
the meaning of 170.30; (2) a listing of the substance as GRAS in 21 CFR Part 182 or as affirmed as GRAS in 21 CFR Part
184; (3) a food additive regulation; or (4) a sanction or approval granted by FDA or the United States Department of
Agriculture prior to September 6, 1958. If the safety and lawfulness of the substance is not expressly recognized
in an FDA regulation, the burden will rest on the claim's proponent, as a prerequisite to FDA's evaluation of the health
claim, to submit all the scientific data and other relevant information required to demonstrate safety and lawfulness
in accordance with applicable petition requirements. FDA will withhold review of the health claim until it is satisfied
on these points.


18. Many comments objected that the proposed safety provisions are unreasonable. A few of these comments specifically
asserted that herbal supplements would almost universally fail the proposed safety requirements because most herbs
are not GRAS for use as a dietary supplement, are not approved food additives, and are not the subject of prior sanctions
or are the subject of prior sanctions that have been waived. Furthermore, the comments complained that FDA's process
for acting on GRAS affirmation petitions is notoriously slow and extremely costly. The comments maintained that
the proposed safety requirements would discourage manufacturers from submitting health claim petitions for dietary
supplements, would delay the approval of such petitions, and could well amount to a total ban on health claims for certain
dietary supplements. The comments suggested that FDA require safety determinations only for those substances with
no history of safe use and provide that the absence of known safety problems will be sufficient proof of safety for substances
with a long history of use. 
Other comments urged FDA to be flexible in its determination of safety for substances in dietary supplements. A number
of these comments stressed the importance of FDA recognizing that safety can be determined solely through the historical
use of such substances. Some of the comments noted that many components of supplements, particularly herbs, have
been used for hundreds or thousands of years without safety problems. The comments also noted that herbs are used safely
throughout three-fourths of the world as a principal means of medicine. The comments declared that regulatory authorities
in Great Britain, Germany, Japan, and many other nations have researched various herbal supplements and found them
to be safe when consumed at the levels of use likely to be contemplated under a health claim petition. One comment also
noted that information concerning accurate dosage, indications, contraindications, and quality control measures
are also available in past editions of the U.S. Pharmacopeias and National Formularies. These comments urged FDA
to accept all relevant data on the safe use of herbal dietary supplements, including foreign studies and monographs
that evidence the safety of these products. One comment declared that FDA is legally bound to consider evidence involving
herb usage outside the United States when reviewing the safety of herbs. 
One comment asserted that FDA should evaluate the safety of vitamins and minerals in terms of their effect on the normal
population and not on those consumers with unusual conditions or sensitivities. The comment acknowledged that such
consumers need clear label ingredient statements as well as education on foods to deal with their problems. The comment
asserted, however, that these consumers should be held responsible for some degree of self-protection. The comment
maintained that this approach is consistent with the agency's policy on persons with allergies to food components.
A few comments asserted that the safety of a dietary supplement should be defined in terms of whether or not harm may
occur under the conditions of use defined by the supplement's labeling, rather than in terms of an arbitrary cutoff
such as the RDI. The comment maintained that a systematic review of all components of dietary supplements is not necessary
and suggested that the agency undertake safety reviews on a case-by-case basis where it believes a potential safety
concern might exist.
Several comments asserted that FDA is not equitable in its concern for the safety of dietary supplements as compared
to the safety of other products regulated by the agency. Some comments asserted that the safety record of dietary supplements
is far better than many FDA-approved food additives such as aspartame, against which, according to the comments,
the agency receives and ignores thousands of consumer complaints annually. Other comments asserted that FDA's intense
interest in the safety of products would be better focused on prescription drugs, which are responsible for over 1/2
million deaths annually as compared to the no or few deaths attributable to the consumption of dietary supplements.

However, several comments supported FDA's proposal to require that petitioners for a health claim for a substance
in a dietary supplement demonstrate that the substance is safe and lawful. The comments agreed with the agency that
such a requirement is implicit in the act, and that the labeling law in no way diminishes FDA's responsibility to ensure
the safety of foods. 
FDA concludes that the preliminary requirement that the safety of a substance be demonstrated should apply to substances
in dietary supplements in the same manner that it applies to substances in foods in conventional food form. The amendment
to the act enacted by the 1990 amendments cannot be implemented independently of the remaining portions of the act
(see section 9 of the 1990 amendments). The act must be considered as a whole, and FDA's responsibility for ensuring
the safety of foods is explicitly provided for in other sections of the act (see sections 201(s), 402(a)(1) and (2),
and 409 of the act).
As the agency explained in the dietary supplement health claims proposal, the fact that the act contains such explicit
safety authority is particularly significant because the agency will be specifically authorizing the health claims
that will be made. In view of this affirmative action, FDA authorization of a health claim places the agency's imprimatur
on the claim. Moreover, the claim will encourage consumption of the substance. It would be a violation of the agency's
responsibility under the act to authorize a health claim about a substance, whether it be in a dietary supplement or
in food in conventional food form, without being satisfied that the use of the substance is safe. Certainly, FDA would
have almost no assurance that it would be protecting the public health if it permitted, as some comments suggest, all
substances except those that are actually known to cause safety problems to be the subject of health claims. It would
be a great and tragic irony if substances that were the subject of health claims because of one effect caused injury
because of another. This is the situation that Congress sought to avert by including section 403(r)(3)(A)(ii) in
the act. FDA's preliminary requirement is fully consistent with the principles that underlie that section.
The fact that some herbs and other ingredients of dietary supplements have been used for thousands of years does not
necessarily justify a conclusion by FDA that their use under all conditions is safe, but it may. First, FDA needs a basis
for concluding that such use was in fact without harmful effect. Second, FDA needs a basis for concluding that consumption
of ingredients in a supplement carrying a health claim would be in amounts comparable to those consumed safely in the
past. The proponents of claims for such substances are certainly free to demonstrate that the use of those substances
is generally recognized as safe based on their common use in food prior to 1958. The agency notes, however, that the
use of many of these substances has been primarily as a drug, tonic, or folk remedy, rather than as food (see 53 FR 16544
at 16545; May 10, 1988). This fact is confirmed by some of the comments summarized above. As drugs, the levels and frequency
of use of these substances may have been significantly different than the levels and frequency of use that will result
from their use as foods. Although the agency will consider evidence involving herb usage outside the United States,
FDA still needs to review data on the identity of the substance, the safety of the substance, the use of the substance
in food, the context of its use, and the frequency of use in the country where use of the substance occurred (see 50 FR
27294 at 27295, July 2, 1985). Evidence that another country has studied the safety of an herbal supplement and found
it to be safe would certainly be relevant and should be submitted to FDA. It is important, however, that as much of the
evidence that provided the basis for the country's determination as is possible be submitted to FDA.
Although formal recognition of safety by FDA admittedly can be lengthy and expensive, such formal recognition is
not required under this preliminary requirement. In responding to concerns raised by comments suggesting that FDA
recognize manufacturers' private GRAS determinations, the agency stated in the health claims final rule the following
concerning 101.14(b)(3)(ii) (58 FR 2478 at 2502 through 2503):


FDA acknowledges that the GRAS affirmation and food additive listing process can be lengthy. Thus, FDA designed 101.14(b)(3)(ii)
to provide flexibility with respect to the type of showing of safety that is necessary to make a substance eligible
to be the subject of a health claim. GRAS affirmation and food additive listing are but two of the procedures by which
a substance may meet this preliminary requirement.


FDA intends to consider the basis of manufacturers' independent GRAS determinations where such determinations
are submitted with petitions for health claims and may use its discretion to accept, without formal affirmation,
the independent determination of GRAS where FDA believes that such action would be appropriate. As FDA pointed out
in the previous comment, however, the agency would not be fulfilling its responsibilities under the act if it were
to permit a substance to be the subject of a health claim without satisfying itself that the use of that substance is
safe.


Although FDA will consider all manufacturers' independent GRAS determinations where the basis for such determinations
are submitted with petitions for health claims, the agency advises that it will generally not be possible for FDA to
judge whether GRAS determinations based on complex scientific evidence are valid within the short timeframes mandated
under the 1990 amendments for health claims petitions. Instead, agency agreement with an independent determination
that a substance is GRAS will be most likely where the substance is an ingredient, or a component of a food ingredient,
that was in common use in food prior to January 1, 1958, in a similar context. However, where such agreement occurs,
the agreement does not constitute GRAS affirmation. Instead, the history of common use in food, coupled with the fact
that FDA knows of no reason to question the safety of the food ingredient, means that the substance will be treated as
if it is an unlisted GRAS substance (as provided for in  170.30(d) and 182.1(a) (21 CFR 170.30(d) and 182.1(a)))
in the manner provided for in the food ingredient list in 21 CFR Part 182.



(58 FR 2478 at 2503.)



Under this final rule, this statement is fully applicable to substances in dietary supplements. The agency believes
that this policy on independent determinations that a substance is GRAS demonstrates that FDA will be flexible in
assessing conformance with the safety preliminary requirement. 
FDA disagrees with assertions that the agency should evaluate the safety of dietary supplements in terms of only the
normal population. It would be unconscionable for the agency to adopt a policy of ignoring adverse effects, some of
which could be life-threatening, of any foods, including dietary supplements, on vulnerable segments of the population.
Furthermore, there is no basis under the act for such a policy. FDA does attempt, however, to find the most practicable
solutions to assuring consumers of a safe food supply. For example, the agency generally does not base safety decisions
on atypical population subgroups that will use the product. Where there are subgroups of consumers (e.g., consumers
with certain sensitivities) that could suffer adverse effects from consuming the product, FDA may place certain
restrictions on the use of the product or rely on labeling solutions (such as those the agency has used for sulfiting
agents and yellow 5) as a condition for its safe use, rather than denying the availability of the product to the entire
population. 
Thus, for all the foregoing reasons, FDA is making health claims for substances in dietary supplements, like claims
for any other food, subject to 101.14(b)(3)(ii).


C. Scientific Standard


19. Many comments expressed concern that FDA would apply the term ``significant scientific agreement'' in an unreasonable
manner by demanding too much supporting evidence on substance/disease relationships before approving health claims.

Several comments insisted that FDA is misinterpreting the requirements for the scientific standard for food in conventional
food form as well as for dietary supplements. The comments asserted that the law does not require that there be significant
scientific agreement that a nutrient/disease relationship has been conclusively established, but only that the
statements made in a claim be supported by the available evidence. As an example, one of the comments asserted that
the requirements of the law would be fully met by a properly qualified label claim such as, ``Although no scientific
consensus has been established, several clinical studies suggest that daily consumption of Vitamin C as part of a
well-balanced diet may reduce the frequency of colds.'' A number of comments asserted that the standards for authorizing
health claims on foods are more stringent than those authorizing the use of drug claims. Several comments argued that
FDA is being unduly restrictive by requiring that manufacturers perform expensive randomized, double-blind, placebo-controlled
tests to prove the validity of a claim under the proposed regulations. These comments stated that such requirements
would deter manufacturers from seeking new uses for herbs and other substances used in dietary supplements. The comments
maintained that a more lenient standard would encourage manufacturers to engage in research to develop more healthful
products. The comments further asserted that the disparate treatment of foods and drugs is especially unfair when
the enormous difference in safety factors between dietary supplements and untested prescription drugs is considered.

Some of the comments asserted that FDA had not been fair to date in its evaluations of health claims under this standard.
One of these comments asserted that FDA had approved only four of the ten congressionally-proposed health claims,
not seven, as FDA claimed in the preamble to the proposed regulations. 
Some comments maintained that FDA should not require a unanimous or near-unanimous consensus among experts in order
to find that there is ``significant scientific agreement'' concerning a claim. A few of the comments pointed out that
the legislative history of the 1990 amendments clearly indicates that such a level of agreement is not to be required.
Other comments urged that FDA consider the requirement for ``significant scientific agreement'' to be satisfied
as long as there is agreement among a majority of scientists familiar with the research in a given area. These comments
noted that Commissioner Kessler offered testimony supporting this interpretation before the U.S. House of Representatives
Subcommittee on Health and the Environment. Other comments maintained that the requirement for ``significant scientific
agreement'' only requires agreement among a significant number of qualified experts. One of these comments requested
that FDA include a provision in the regulations that the standard of ``significant scientific agreement'' is not
one of unanimity to prevent confusion among manufacturers and consumers. A few comments asked that FDA's regulations
include a provision that guarantees that ``significant scientific agreement'' will be considered to have been achieved
when a credible health authority, particularly an agency of the U.S. Government, recommends the consumption of a
nutrient because of its relationship to a disease or health-related condition.
One comment suggested that FDA not use the phrase ``significant scientific agreement'' to evaluate proposed health
claims, despite its inclusion in the language of the 1990 amendments, because the meaning of the phrase is ambiguous.
The comment suggested that FDA should simply consider the totality of publicly available scientific evidence to
determine whether or not a particular health claim can be justified. 
FDA disagrees with assertions that it is conducting validity assessments for health claims in an unduly restrictive
manner. FDA does not require that manufacturers perform controlled clinical trials to prove the validity of a claim.
To the contrary, as discussed in the health claims final rule (58 FR 2478 at 2506), the scientific standard for health
claims is less stringent than the requirements for approval of a new drug. In the case of a new drug, section 505(d)(5)
of the act (21 U.S.C. 355(d)(5)) states that the Secretary shall refuse to approve an application for approval of such
a drug where there is a lack of substantial evidence that the drug will have the effect that it purports or is represented
to have under the conditions of use prescribed, recommended, or suggested in the proposed labeling thereof. Section
505(d) provides further that the term ``substantial evidence'' means evidence consisting of adequate and well-controlled
investigations, including clinical investigations (human studies conducted in a controlled clinical setting),
by experts qualified by scientific training and experience to evaluate the effectiveness of the drug involved. (The
statutory term ``substantial evidence'' should not be confused with the same term used by some comments to refer to
``more than a scintilla and less than a preponderance'' of evidence.) Based on this statutory direction, the agency
has identified a number of characteristics that are present in ``adequate and well-controlled'' studies in 314.126
(21 CFR 314.126).
Section 101.14(c) of FDA regulations does not mandate requirements as stringent as those for drugs in section 505(d)(5)
of the act. Section 101.14(c) contains no mention of ``substantial evidence,'' ``adequate and well-controlled
investigations,'' or of ``clinical investigations.'' To the contrary, 101.14(c) contains more flexibility
than the drug provisions of the act because it provides FDA with authority to authorize claims based on ``scientific
evidence (including evidence from well-designed studies conducted in a manner which is consistent with generally
recognized scientific procedures and principles), that there is significant agreement among experts qualified
by scientific training and experience to evaluate such claims, that the claim is supported by such evidence'' (section
403(r)(3)(B)(i) of the act).
Consistent with this flexibility, FDA did not prescribe a specific set, type, or number of studies as being sufficient
to support a health claim in the health claims final rule that applied to food in conventional food form. In that rule,
the agency advised (58 FR 2478 at 2506) that it would consider all relevant data on a topic, including clinical studies,
epidemiological data, and animal studies. 
In addition, the 1990 amendments directed FDA to consider 10 nutrient-disease relationships. In the January 6, 1993,
final rules, FDA authorized claims with respect to seven of those 10 relationships (see 58 FR 2537, 2552, 2622, 2665,
2739, 2787, and 2820). In addition, FDA has recently proposed to authorize claims concerning an eighth, folic acid
and neural tube defects (see 58 FR 53254, October 14, 1993). FDA believes that these approvals demonstrate that it
is not conducting validity assessments for health claims in an unduly restrictive manner.
FDA agrees that the legislative history of the 1990 amendments makes clear that Congress did not intend, in calling
for significant scientific agreement about the support for a claim, to require that such agreement represents a full
consensus among scientists. The House Report (Ref. 1) states: 


* * * the standard does not require that there be a unanimous agreement among experts. Instead there must be a significant
agreement among experts, but it does not require that every expert in the field approve or agree with the claim. 


The agency shares the comments' concern that a requirement of consensus would mean that some valid health claims would
not be authorized and, by restricting such claims, would counter Congress' intent that health claims supported by
a significant scientific agreement be made available to consumers. The agency never intended to require that claims
be supported by a consensus among scientists and has not done so. 
The agency is sensitive to the comments' perception that the scientific standard, particularly the phrase ``significant
scientific agreement,'' is subjective. The agency believes, however, that any standard involving the evaluation
of scientific evidence and opinions derived from that evidence must be somewhat subjective. FDA, in proposing not
to define ``significant agreement'' among experts in the November 27, 1991 (56 FR 60537 at 60548) proposal, noted
that each situation may differ with the nature of the claimed substance/disease relationship. The agency believes
that in deciding whether significant scientific agreement about the validity of a claim exists, it is necessary to
consider both the extent of agreement and the nature of the disagreement on a case-by-case basis. 
The House Report (Ref. 1) makes clear that Congress intended the ``significant scientific agreement'' standard
to be a flexible one by pointing out that, in reviewing scientific studies, FDA may give greater weight to the studies
that it finds more persuasive. The House Report also clarifies that the overriding consideration in assessing whether
to authorize a claim should be the Secretary's level of comfort about the validity of the claim. The agency believes
that this clarification provides clear guidance for the application of the standard, and thus it is not incorporating
the changes requested by the comments in the codified language of the regulations.
FDA does not believe it has in any way been unfair in its approval of health claims to date. Earlier in this preamble in
response to comment 2, FDA explained why certain specific health claims were not approved. Nevertheless, the agency's
statement in the dietary supplement health claims proposal that it had authorized claims on 7 of the 10 nutrient-disease
relationships is correct. In the case of 3 of the relationships, however, the claims were authorized for foods rather
than specific nutrients. In these cases, as explained previously, although there was sufficient evidence to attribute
certain disease risk reductions to the consumption of certain foods, and those foods are marked by significant levels
of the nutrients in question, there was insufficient evidence to attribute any disease risk reduction directly to
consumption of the nutrients themselves. 
FDA does not agree that it should define ``significant scientific agreement'' as agreement among a majority of scientists
familiar with the issues. Commissioner Kessler's statements about significant scientific agreement being 50 or
60 percent agreement were intended to show the contrast between this term and the term ``consensus,'' not to provide
a specific definition of ``significant scientific agreement.'' There is simply no bright line that FDA can draw in
this area. Ultimately, the agency must exercise its scientific judgment, arrived at after input from the scientific
community. 
The agency does not agree that significant scientific agreement should be considered to have been achieved when a
credible health authority, particularly an agency of the U.S. Government, recommends the consumption of a nutrient
because of its relationship to a disease or health-related condition. While FDA recognizes the significance of such
recommendations, Congress charged FDA with the responsibility of authorizing health claims on the food label and
labeling. Nonetheless, the agency is mindful of the admonition in section 403(r)(4)(C) of the act that reads: ``If
a petition for a regulation under subparagraph (3)(B) relies on a report from an authoritative scientific body of
the United States, the Secretary shall consider such report and shall justify any decision rejecting the conclusions
of such report.'' 
Accordingly, FDA is retaining the requirement for ``significant scientific agreement'' in this regulation. 
20. Many comments applauded the agency's determination not to underrate any scientific evidence on the basis of its
cultural or geographic origin. One of these comments noted that the United States is one of the most ethnically diverse
nations in the world and stated that a study done anywhere in the world is likely to be relevant to at least one U.S. subpopulation.
A few of these comments noted that some of the studies done on herbal dietary supplements have been conducted under
foreign drug protocols and requested assurance that FDA would consider such data to be part of the publicly available
scientific evidence supporting prospective health claims. Another of these comments asserted that the ``totality
of publicly available scientific evidence'' should include not only ``well designed studies'' but also ethnobotanical
and other traditional usage information which is often available for herbs and other dietary supplements.
The agency reaffirms its commitment to consider any evidence submitted in support of the scientific merits of a claim
and in the context of the totality of available evidence. FDA will not underrate any study on the basis of its cultural
or geographic origin. Evidence in support of a proposed health claim, however, will attain value in direct proportion
to the significance in the U.S. population of the effects of the substance in question on the disease or health-related
condition addressed by the claim (see 101.14(b)(1)). Also, the agency advises that it will consider ethnobotanical
and other traditional usage information. However, the agency points out that under 101.14(c), the evidence
must provide the basis for significant scientific agreement that the claim is valid. 


D. General Labeling Requirements


In the health claims final rule, FDA established a number of general requirements for health claims for food in conventional
food form in 101.14(d) to ensure that consumers are provided with valid and reliable information about the
value that ingestion (or reduced ingestion) of a particular substance, as part of a total dietary pattern, may have
in affecting certain diseases or health-related conditions. 
In the dietary supplement health claims proposal, the agency proposed that dietary supplements be subject to the
same general requirements that it has established for food in conventional food form in 101.14(d). The agency
advised that specific references to dietary supplements in 101.14(d) are not necessary because FDA's revision
of 101.14(a)(2), the definition of the term ``substance,'' to include components of dietary supplements
will link dietary supplements to the health claim for which 101.14(d) prescribes general requirements.


1. FDA Authorization of Valid Claims


Section 101.14(d)(1) provides that when FDA determines that a health claim is valid, the agency will propose a regulation
in Subpart E of Part 101 to authorize the use of the claim. Further, the provision states that if the claim pertains to
a substance not provided for in 101.9, FDA will propose to amend that regulation to include declaration of the
substance. To ensure that the provisions established in 101.14(d)(1) apply equally to all forms of dietary
supplements, the agency proposed in the dietary supplement proposal to revise 101.14(d)(1) to reference,
in addition to 101.9, the provisions of 101.36 (21 CFR 101.36), which establish requirements for the
nutrition labeling of dietary supplements of vitamins and minerals. 
FDA received no comments requesting changes in this aspect of the proposal. Therefore, the agency is adopting this
section as proposed.


2. General Requirements


Section 101.14(d)(2) requires that health claims on foods in conventional food form: (1) Be consistent with the specific
authorizing regulation for the claim; (2) be limited to describing the value that ingestion (or reduced ingestion)
of the substance, as part of a total dietary pattern, may have on a particular disease or health-related condition;
(3) be complete, truthful, and not misleading; (4) contain all required information for that claim in one place without
other intervening material (except that the principal display panel (PDP) of the label or labeling may bear a reference
statement such as ``See attached pamphlet for information about calcium and osteoporosis,'' with the entire claim
appearing elsewhere on the other labeling); and (5) enable the public to comprehend the information provided and
to understand the relative significance of such information in the context of a total daily diet. If the claim is about
the effects of consuming the substance at decreased dietary levels, the level of the substance in the food must be sufficiently
low to justify the claim. For example, if a definition for use of the term ``low'' has been established for that substance,
the substance must be present at a level that meets the requirements for use of that term, unless a specific alternative
level has been established for the substance in the authorizing regulation. If the claim is about the effects of consuming
the substance at other than decreased dietary levels, the level of the substance in the food must be sufficiently high
and in an appropriate form to justify the claim. For example, if a definition for use of the term ``high'' for that substance
has been established, the substance must be present at a level that meets the requirements for use of that term, unless
a specific alternative level has been established for the substance in the authorizing regulation. (See 101.14(d)(2)(vii)(A)
for additional requirements where the food meets the ``high'' or ``low'' requirements based on its reference amount
customarily consumed and the labeled serving size differs from that amount. See 101.14(d)(2)(vii)(B) for
guidance about how a food can meet the ``high'' and ``low'' requirements where the food is sold in a restaurant.)
In the dietary supplement health claims proposal, FDA proposed that dietary supplements be subject to these requirements
to ensure that consumers are provided with scientifically valid, nonmisleading, and reliable information about
the value that ingestion of the particular substance in the dietary supplement may have in affecting a disease or health-related
condition.
21. One comment stated that FDA should mandate that dietary supplements bear health claims for which they are eligible
in order to promote public awareness of the benefits associated with those supplements.
FDA does not believe that it is appropriate to adopt a general policy requiring the inclusion of health claims on the
labels of all foods eligible to bear them. The agency notes that while the 1990 amendments provide for the appearance
of health claims on the labels of foods qualified to bear them, they do not make the appearance of those claims mandatory.

FDA believes that many manufacturers will choose to include health claims on the labels of qualified foods because
of the marketing benefit offered by their appearance. Because health claims provide information regarding the benefits
associated with the increased or decreased dietary intake of various substances in the product rather than information
regarding the particular product itself, consumers will be made aware of the benefits of consuming other foods that
do or do not contain the particular substance, even if a particular food product does not itself bear the health claim.

22. One comment asserted that FDA should require manufacturers who elect to craft their own health claims, rather
than to use the model claim verbatim, to secure agency approval for their claims with respect to understandability.

FDA disagrees with this comment. Section 3(b)(1)(A)(vii) of the 1990 amendments prohibits FDA from requiring persons
to secure agency approval before placing a health claim on a product, provided that the claim is in compliance with
the applicable regulation authorizing the health claim. The House Report (Ref. 1) states that this section ``makes
it clear that the regulations will not require premarket review of each claim; they will only require that the claim
be consistent with the terms and requirements of the regulations.'' The agency believes that it is possible to paraphrase
a model health claim while remaining consistent with the terms and requirements of the regulations permitting that
claim. This position is similar to agency 
policy that permits the use of terminology other than that established in a final OTC drug monograph in labeling of
an OTC drug product to describe indications for use (51 FR 16258, May 1, 1986). Consistent with that policy for OTC drug
labeling, the agency believes that the goal of ensuring scientifically valid, truthful, and nonmisleading labeling
without inhibiting effective consumer communication does not require exclusive use of language in a model health
claim. The model language along with other requirements for a claim will, nevertheless, provide the standard for
measuring the accuracy of alternative language developed by food manufacturers for their products because FDA has
included all mandatory labeling elements of a health claim in the model claim. Of course, manufacturers should recognize
that a health claim that fails to convey all the mandatory elements of the claim will subject a product to regulatory
action.


3. Nutrition Labeling


Section 101.14(d)(3) requires that health claims on foods in conventional food form must bear nutrition labeling
in accordance with  101.9 and 101.10 (21 CFR 101.9 and 101.10). In the dietary supplement health claims proposal,
the agency proposed to revise 101.14(d) to reference 101.36 (21 CFR 101.36), in addition to  101.9
and 101.10. In response to section 403(q)(5)(F) of the act (formerly section 403(q)(5)(E)), 101.36 establishes
requirements for the nutrition labeling of dietary supplements of vitamins and minerals. 
FDA received no comments requesting changes in this aspect of the proposal. Therefore, the agency is adopting this
section as proposed.


E. Prohibited Health Claims


In 101.14(e) of the health claims final rule, FDA established, for foods in conventional food form, a number
of situations where health claims are prohibited. In that paragraph, FDA provides that a health claim may not be made
on the label or in the labeling of a food unless: (1) The claim is specifically provided for in authorizing regulations
in Subpart E of 21 CFR part 101; (2) the claim conforms to all general provisions of 
101.14, as well as to all specific provisions in the authorizing regulation; (3) none of the disqualifying
levels identified in 101.14(a)(5) is exceeded in the food, unless specific alternative levels have been established
for the substance in the authorizing regulation, and the labeling bears a statement that complies with 101.13(h)
highlighting the nutrient that exceeds the disqualifying level; (4) no substance is present at an inappropriate
level as determined in the specific provision authorizing the claim in Subpart E of 21 CFR part 101; (5) the label does
not represent or purport that the food is for infants and toddlers less than 2 years of age except if the claim is specifically
provided for in Subpart E of 21 CFR part 101; and (6) except for dietary supplements, the food contains 10 percent or
more of the RDI or Daily Reference Value (DRV) for vitamin A, vitamin C, iron, calcium, protein, or fiber before any
nutrient addition. 
In the dietary supplement health claims proposal, the agency proposed that dietary supplements be subject to the
general prohibitions that have been established for foods in conventional food form in 101.14(e). The agency
tentatively concluded that this action was appropriate because these prohibitions: (1) Reflect the statutory restriction
in section 403(r)(1)(B) of the act that requires that health claims be made in accordance with the provisions of section
403(r)(5)(D) for dietary supplements; (2) ensure that inappropriate, unsubstantiated, and fraudulent health
claims are not made; and (3) reduce the potential for consumer confusion when confronted with a situation in which
there would be health claims for substances when they are present in dietary supplements but not when they are present
in foods in conventional food form. The agency advised that specific references to dietary supplements in 101.14(e)
generally are not necessary because FDA's proposed revision in 101.14(a)(2) of the definition of the term
``substance'' to include components of dietary supplements will bring dietary supplements within the coverage
of 101.14(e).
FDA did propose, however, to include a reference to dietary supplements in the introductory sentence of paragraph
(e) to clarify that dietary supplements may be food. Specifically, FDA proposed to insert the phrase ``regardless
of whether the food is in conventional food form or dietary supplement form'' into that sentence to make clear that
no expressed or implied health claims may be made on the label or in labeling of any food unless the conditions in that
paragraph are met.


1. Claims Not Authorized By FDA


Section 101.14(e)(1) and (e)(2) prohibit the use on a food label or in food labeling of any claim that expressly or by
implication characterizes the relationship of any substance to a disease or health-related condition unless: (1)
The claim is specifically provided for in Part 101, Subpart E_Specific Requirements for Health Claims; and (2) the
claim conforms to all general provisions of 101.14, as well as to all specific provisions in the appropriate
section in subpart E of 21 CFR part 101. 
23. A number of comments asserted that the marketplace is currently saturated with hundreds of false and misleading
claims, ranging from rather innocuous statements to blatant claims concerning the treatment of cancer, AIDS, heart
disease, asthma, high blood pressure, Alzheimer's disease, diabetes, and other diseases and health-related conditions.
One of these comments urged FDA to regulate as implied health claims those brand names that imply that a product is useful
in preventing particular diseases. The comment asserted that an implied health claim can be made by the inclusion
of the name of a disease in a brand name, as well as by label statements that slant the meaning of a brand name toward disease
prevention. 
FDA realizes there are a number of misleading claims in use on products. The agency reviews these claims as part of its
regular enforcement activities and takes action against such claims based on such factors as the public health significance
of the claim, how clearly it violates the act, and the availability of agency resources.
24. A number of comments stated that manufacturers should be allowed to include information on the traditional use
of various supplements on their labels. These comments noted that many other countries allow supplement labels to
indicate traditional uses of the product, provided that the level of evidence supporting such use is accurately represented.
Many comments asserted that statements concerning the safe usage of dietary supplements should not be considered
a health claim. The comments maintained that the exclusion of such information from food labeling would endanger
the public health. 
Dietary supplements that bear labeling that expressly or by implication characterizes the relationship of any substance
to a disease or health-related condition will be subject to the provisions of section 403(r) of the act. However, if
the claim reveals that the product is intended to be used in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention
of a disease, as would likely be the situation where the product is presented as an alternative to conventional drug
therapy, the product, like any other product that does so, is a drug under section 201(g)(1)(B) of the act and subject
to the requirements for drugs in Chapter V of the act. 
However, supplement manufacturers, like all other food manufacturers, are welcome to submit health claim petitions
that establish the validity of claims that characterize the relationship of a substance to a disease or a health-related
condition in a manner that is appropriate for a food. (See section III.G. of this document.) Any such petition that
shows that the preliminary requirements in 101.14(b) and the scientific standard for a health claim in 101.14(c)
are met will provide the basis for a proposal to authorize a claim in accordance with section 403(r)(4)(A)(i) of the
act.
In addition, FDA advises manufacturers of dietary supplements that where a claim does not include one or both of the
basic elements of a health claim, it generally constitutes dietary guidance that may be provided on the label or in
labeling, so long as it is presented in a truthful and nonmisleading manner. 
25. One comment urged that FDA permit the appearance of preliminary health claims on the labeling of a product other
than its label. The comment maintained that the 1990 amendments draw a clear distinction between a product label and
its labeling and noted that labeling has much more room in which a manufacturer may sufficiently explain the current
state of scientific evidence regarding a preliminary claim. 
FDA disagrees with this comment. Section 403(r)(1) of the act clearly prohibits the appearance of health claims that
are not made in accordance with FDA regulations and that appear ``

in the label or labeling 

 of the food (emphasis added).'' The agency's objections to preliminary claims are fully discussed in this preamble
in its response to comment 4.


2. Additional Limits on Health Claims


In the health claims final rule (58 FR 2478 at 2534), FDA adopted new 101.14(e)(6) to require consistency with
dietary guidelines by prohibiting health claims unless the food contains 10 percent or more of the RDI or DRV for vitamin
A, vitamin C, iron, calcium, protein, or fiber per reference amount customarily consumed prior to any nutrient addition.
(A complete discussion of why these specific criteria were selected appears in the preamble of that document (see
58 FR 2478 at 2521 through 2522).) This provision stresses the importance of selecting foods so that dietary sources
of calories are coupled with sources of nutrients. This approach incorporates established levels of significance
for nutrients in food and is based on the amounts in foods of certain nutrients required to be listed on the label as part
of mandatory nutrition labeling. As such, this approach applies to food in conventional food form. 
FDA specifically exempted dietary supplements from this requirement. Such supplements are intended only to provide
nutritive value to the daily diet, and they make no pretense of serving as substitutes for conventional food. (Nutrient
supplements in conventional food form are, however, intended to serve as substitutes for conventional food.) As
a result, it would not be logical to hold such products to criteria designed to ensure consistency with dietary guidelines
for conventional food. A dietary supplement that meets the qualifying criterion in 101.14(d)(2)(vii) and
that does not contain a nutrient at a disqualifying level specified in 101.14(a)(5) possesses nutritive value
for a health claim irrespective of whether or not it may also provide calories. Accordingly, in the dietary supplement
health claims proposal, FDA did not propose to make any change in the exemption for dietary supplements from the provisions
of 101.14(e)(6). For consistency with the proposed definition of the term ``dietary supplement,'' however,
FDA proposed to revise the wording for this exemption to delete the phrase ``not in conventional food form'' because
the definition of ``dietary supplement'' states that such foods are not in conventional food form. 
FDA received no comments requesting changes in this aspect of the proposal. Therefore, the agency is adopting this
section as proposed.


F. Applicability


In the health claims final rule, FDA established a provision in 101.14(g) stating that the requirements for
health claims in 101.14 apply to foods intended for human consumption that are offered for sale. In the dietary
supplement proposal, FDA proposed that dietary supplements also be covered by 101.14(g). FDA stated that
it had tentatively concluded that a reference to dietary supplements was appropriate in paragraph (g) to clarify
that dietary supplements can be food. Specifically, FDA proposed to revise paragraph (g) as follows:




Applicability

. The requirements of this section apply to foods intended for human consumption that are offered for sale, regardless
of whether the foods are in conventional food form or dietary supplement form.


26. One comment asserted that FDA should allow health claims authorized for use on dietary supplements to also appear
on OTC drug products that provide ``high'' levels of a particular nutrient, e.g., calcium-osteoporosis claims on
calcium carbonate antacid tablets. 
FDA received a comment similar to this one on the health claims proposal. This comment provides no basis for the agency
to provide a different response to this comment than it did in the health claims final rule.
As explained in the preamble of the health claims final rule (58 FR 2478 at 2500), multiple use products that are both
foods and drugs present a difficult set of competing concerns for the agency. Such products are likely to be both an
OTC drug and a dietary supplement.
Most OTC drug products are developed to address some type of acute medical problem that is expected to be of short duration.
If the problem persists, it is important that the person with the problem know that it may be more severe than he or she
otherwise thought, and that he or she should seek medical attention. Labeling on such products, therefore, includes
instructions to use the product for a limited period of time and, if the problem persists, to seek medical intervention.
Thus, the time limits on use of the product are important to the health of the users.
Dietary supplements, on the other hand, are developed for inclusion in a daily diet at levels that are consistent with
dietary use and may often be consumed throughout most of a person's lifetime. Labeling on dietary supplements contains
no instructions for seeking medical intervention or for limiting the duration of consumption of the supplement.
Rather, under the new regulations, dietary supplements will be able to bear nutrient content and health claims, which
focus the consumer's attention on the advantages that consuming the product will have in helping the consumer to maintain
a healthy diet. Moreover, where the supplement bears a health claim, the claim will contain information about how
long-term ingestion of the supplement may promote health.
Where dietary levels and therapeutic levels differ (as is generally the case and is in fact the case with antacids and
calcium supplements), an apparent conflict is created when both food and drug labeling appear on the same product.
In the case of the drug labeling, consumers are given directions for use that involve high consumption during a limited
time period. In the case of the food labeling, consumers are given directions for lower consumption with no time constraints.
Even though label instructions may identify those directions for food and drug use in separate locations, FDA is concerned
that consumers will incorrectly assume that the therapeutic dosage is appropriate for dietary use, and that the directions
for food use will undercut the warning in the drug labeling to seek medical care if the condition persists. Where the
labeling is not properly followed, significant adverse consequences may result.
The agency knows of no broad approach that it can use to harmonize a nutrient content claim or a health claim with drug
labeling. A drug that is labeled with instructions for use that both limit and do not limit consumption would be misbranded
under section 502(a) of the act (21 U.S.C. 352(a)) if it failed to contain a material fact_that is, how to reconcile
these conflicting instructions. 
However, FDA does not believe that it would be appropriate to preclude such claims under all circumstances. Such claims
may be permissible if a firm can demonstrate that dual claims can be made in a manner that will neither misbrand the product
nor create a safety problem. The agency suggests that anyone desiring to make a health claim or a nutrient content claim
that complies with section 403(r) of the act on a product that is both a food and a drug contact the Center for Drug Evaluation
and Research, OTC Compliance Branch (HFD312), FDA, 7500 Standish Pl., Rockville, MD 20855, to discuss whether
it would be possible to put such a claim on the product and still comply with the drug provisions of the act. 


G. Petitions


27. A number of comments urged FDA to streamline its procedures for approving health claims in order that dietary supplement
manufacturers may include the most current, reliable information on their products. The comments stated that the
inclusion of such information is critically important to dietary supplements because, unlike foods in conventional
food form, they are consumed only for the health benefits associated with them. The comments specifically proposed
that FDA add the following paragraphs to 101.70(j):


(4) 

 Final Rule

. FDA will, within 120 days of the date of publication of the proposed rule, issue a final rule authorizing or prohibiting
the requested use of the health claim.
(5) 

 Expedited Action on certain petitions

. If FDA determines during its initial review of the petition that it accurately represents the recommendations of
any agency or department of the U.S. Government with public health responsibilities, or of any other public health
organization that is recognized as a credible source of information on diet and health, FDA will publish a proposed
rule authorizing the requested use of the claim no later than 60 days from the date of receipt of the petition and will
issue a final rule no later than 60 days from the date of publication of the proposed rule.


The comments maintained that new provision in paragraph (j)(4) would correct an obvious oversight in the existing
regulations, i.e., the establishment of a firm deadline for a proposed rule but no firm deadline for a final rule. The
comments also contended that paragraph (j)(5) is necessary to address FDA's failure to act promptly to approve claims
that are based on the recommendations of public health authorities, such as its failure to approve a health claim for
folic acid in accord with the recommendations of PHS agencies. 
FDA advises that its failure to specify in 101.70(j) a deadline for the publication of a final rule regarding
the use of a proposed health claim was not an oversight. Section 403(r)(4)(A)(i) does not require that the agency adhere
to any deadline for the publication of a final rule. While FDA could establish such a timeframe by regulation, it does
not believe that the adoption of such a requirement would be prudent. The comment period following the publication
of proposed rules is a critical step in determining whether a proposed regulation is appropriate for adoption. In
the instance of health claim regulations, significant information concerning the validity of the substance-disease
relationship underlying the proposed health claim may be submitted by interested parties during the comment period.
Also, the comment period may bring to light a previously unforeseen potential for the use of a health claim, if adopted
without modification, to be misleading to consumers or to create serious potential threats to the public health.
The agency has no way to guarantee that it will be able to adequately resolve such problems within the suggested timeframe.
In such instances, if faced with a specific timeframe, FDA would be forced to either deny an otherwise valid health
claim petition, or to approve it without erecting the regulatory framework that it believes necessary to ensure that
the public health is safeguarded. Therefore, FDA is not adopting the suggested time limit on the issuance of a final
rule. However, the agency advises that it committed to issuing final rules on health claim petitions as quickly as
possible consistent with the issues presented and the agency's available resources.
With respect to suggestions for shorter timeframes for certain petitions, FDA advises that the agency's ability
to meet timeframes is influenced by many factors, such as work priorities and availability of personnel. FDA considers
the statutory timeframes for assessing the validity of health claims and for issuing a proposed regulation to be extremely
short, given the need to evaluate the totality of available scientific evidence on a substance and a disease or a health-related
condition. Given the agency's limited resources, it would not be practicable to shorten these timeframes further.
However, FDA points out that although action on petitions for most claims will require virtually all of the time provided
by the statutory timeframes, nothing would prohibit the agency from acting in less time than the timeframes provide
if it is possible to do so. Thus, it is likely that a petition for a claim on a well-accepted substance/disease relationship
would be reviewed more expeditiously than one for which scientific agreement is not as clear.
28. A few comments urged FDA to consider the limited label space available on many dietary supplements in developing
model health claims. The comments stated that concise model claims will provide guidance to manufacturers on how
to convey health claims in succinct statements that comply with all of FDA's requirements and will thus help ensure
that the health claims presented to consumers are clear and comprehensible.
FDA realizes that there is a limit to the amount of information that can be presented on a food label. However, the agency
believes that it must ensure that consumers understand that factors other than dietary intake of the nutrient may
bear on the substance-disease relationship. Given the imperative of ensuring consumer understanding of a message
that must be presented in a very limited space, the agency is faced with the difficult task of determining what information
is necessary in a claim, and what information is not. FDA believes that its regulations in subpart E of 21 CFR part 101
represent an acceptable balance between the consumer's right to understand the full context of the claim and the manufacturer's
concern over claim length. By delineating the information that is mandatory and optional in a claim, FDA is relieving
manufacturers from having to include information that is of tangential importance but ensuring that those who wish
to make a claim do so in a manner that provides a useful and understandable message to consumers. FDA advises that it
will take a similar approach when providing model health claims in the future. FDA also notes that manufacturers who
are not satisfied with the model claim are free to develop their own versions of the claim, provided that those versions
include all of the information required by the authorizing regulation.
29. Several comments raised the issue of product-specific health claims by asserting that many manufacturers will
be dissuaded from undertaking the scientific studies and other investments necessary to obtain approval of new health
claims petitions by the fact that approved health claims will be allowed for use on all qualifying products. However,
a number of comments stressed that in a health claim, the role of the total diet should be emphasized rather than the
role of a specific food in risk reduction.
FDA advises that section 403(r)(1)(B) of the act pertains to a claim about the relationship between a nutrient and
a disease or health-related condition, rather than about particular food product and such a condition. While the
agency has used the term ``substance'' in lieu of the word ``nutrient'' and has said that a ``substance'' can be a food,
in doing so the agency was only trying to cover circumstances such as those presented by fruits, vegetables, and grain
products in which it was not possible to identify the specific nutrient in a broad class of foods that was having the
observed effect on the risk of disease. FDA was not thereby including formulated products as possible subjects of
health claims. Such products are formulated to include particular substances because of the nutritional effects
of those substances. Thus, a health claim for such a product would appropriately be about the substance in the formulated
product and not about the product itself. 
In addition, section 403(r)(3)(B)(iii) of the act directs the agency to require that health claims enable the public
to understand the information in the context of the total daily diet. As explained above, FDA finds that to effect Congress'
intent in passing the 1990 amendments, the same requirement should apply to health claims made on dietary supplements.
FDA believes that a claim that refers specifically to the effects on a disease or health-related condition resulting
from the consumption of a certain brand name of product would unduly emphasize the importance of that product and not
the importance of the total daily diet. Also, such claims could imply that other brands of the same food, as well as other
foods containing the substance that is the subject of the claim, might not have the same effect on the disease or health-related
condition and thus would be misleading under section 403(a) of the act. Accordingly, the agency finds that it is not
appropriate to approve product-specific health claims.
30. One comment suggested that FDA provide regular monthly or quarterly reports concerning newly approved health
claim petitions for display in the supplement section of stores. The comment maintained that such a list distributed
by FDA would increase consumer confidence in the claims when they appear on supplement labels.
Although FDA recognizes that there could be benefits to consumers from such reports, the agency simply does not have
the resources to provide the reports on an ongoing basis. However, FDA expects that trade associations and other interested
parties will provide information to firms that will ultimately be passed on to consumers. 


IV. Constitutional Issues


A. First Amendment


1. General


31. Several comments raised concerns that the regulations violate the First Amendment. Comments cautioned that
the regulations would be unconstitutional if they limited the dissemination of scientific opinion or prevented
scientifically valid, well-balanced information from reaching the public. 
In the final rule on health claims for foods in conventional food form, 58 FR 2478 at 2524 through 2528 (January 6, 1993),
the agency addressed in detail the First Amendment implications of its regulation of health claims on the food label
and in food labeling. The agency concluded that its regulations, and the act as amended by the 1990 amendments, do not
violate the First Amendment. FDA considers its earlier analysis to be relevant to the present rulemaking and incorporates
it into this document. The agency notes that none of the comments submitted on the proposed rule on health claims for
dietary supplements disputed the agency's earlier discussion, and no comments argued that subsequent court decisions
have called the agency's conclusions into question. 
FDA disagrees with the comments that asserted that these regulations unconstitutionally suppress scientific opinion.
The regulations address what may appear in labeling; they do not affect any other means of disseminating information.
Indeed, far from limiting the dispersal of scientific information, as stated above, these regulations, which implement
the 1990 amendments to the act, permit more information to appear on the label than the act allowed before its amendment.

The agency does not agree with the comments' implication that the Constitution requires a more lenient standard of
scientific validity than that codified in 101.14(c). FDA has a strong interest in ensuring that the information
that appears on the food label is scientifically valid and believes that the standard it has adopted best furthers
that interest. When FDA seeks to ensure that food is not misbranded, it may place restrictions on label contents. See


SEC

 v. 

Wall Street Publishing Institute

, 851 F.2d 365, 373 (D.C. Cir. 1988), cert. denied, 489 U.S. 1066 (1989); 

American Frozen Food Institute

 v.

 Mathews

, 413 F. Supp. 548, 555 (D.D.C. 1976), 

aff'd

, 555 F.2d 1059 (D.C. Cir. 1977). Contrary to the view of the comments, ``the First Amendment does not guarantee the
right to employ every conceivable method of communication at all times and in all places'' (

Members of City Council

 v.

 Taxpayers for Vincent

, 466 U.S. 789, 812 (1984)). Indeed, ``Freedom of Speech does not include the freedom to violate the labeling provisions
of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act.'' (

United States

 v.

 Articles of Food * * * Clover Club Potato Chips

, 67 F.R.D. 419, 424 (D. Idaho 1975)).


2. Pure Speech


31a. One comment asserted that health claims are not commercial in nature and are entitled to full First Amendment
protection. This comment described health claims as typically being mere recitations of scientific findings made
by independent medical authorities and backed by substantial agreement in the medical community. The comment asserted
that the proposed regulations reach ``pure scientific speech'' placed on labels and in product advertisements and
violate the First Amendment by: (1) denying speakers channels of communication to present truthful, nonmisleading
health claims; (2) denying speakers the right to communicate a particular kind of content; (3) discriminating against
certain speakers and forms of communication; and (4) denying the constitutional rights of willing listeners, viewers,
and readers. 
FDA disagrees with the comment. The agency notes initially that the comment misinterprets the scope of the agency's
action. These regulations apply only to health claims made on the label or in labeling of dietary supplements and not
to advertising.
The agency disagrees that health claims are entitled to full First Amendment protection. The agency has stated that,
although it does not consider it necessary for its First Amendment analysis to determine whether or not food labeling
fits the definition of commercial speech, labeling should certainly be considered closer to commercial speech than
to ``pure'' speech (58 FR 2478 at 2525 through 2526). It has also stated that ``[l]abeling statements on food products
intended for sale would clearly appear in the context of a commercial transaction and would `propose' such a transaction.''
(58 FR 2478 at 2527 (citing

 Bolger

 v.

 Youngs Drug Products Corp

., 463 U.S. 60, 66 (1983));

 Central Hudson Gas  Electric Corp.

 v.

 Public Service Commission

, 447 U.S. 557, 562 n.5 (1980)); see also 

Adolph Coors

 v.

 Brady

, 944 F.2d 1543, 1546 (10th Cir. 1991); 

United States

 v.

 General Nutrition, Inc

., 638 F. Supp. 556, 562 (W.D.N.Y. 1986). Commercial speech receives a lesser degree of protection than noncommercial
speech. (See, e.g., 

City of Cincinnati

 v.

 Discovery Network, Inc.

, 113 S. Ct. 1505, 1513 (1993)). The comment does not make a persuasive argument for considering health claims on dietary
supplement labels to be pure speech, and FDA is not aware of any circumstance in which a court has considered such information
on the food label to be ``pure'' speech. Contrary to the comment's assertion, information that is placed on the label
by a commercial enterprise in order to encourage the consumer to make a purchase should not be considered protected
speech simply because it was generated by an independent source. (See, e.g.,

 United States

 v.

 Article of Drug * * * B-Complex Cholinos Capsules

, 362 F.2d 923, 927 (3d Cir. 1966) (free speech was not implicated when third party's statements were taken as evidence
of manufacturer's intent); 

United States

 v.

 Articles of Drug

, 32 F.R.D. 32, 3435 (S.D. Ill. 1963) (First Amendment did not prohibit seizure of third party's book used as
labeling)).
Although the agency disagrees that health claims should be considered noncommercial speech, and although many of
the cases cited in the comment deal with fully protected speech rather than commercial speech and thus do not provide
a useful analytical framework for these regulations, the agency will address the comment's arguments individually.

The agency disagrees that its action denies speakers channels of communication. As discussed above, the agency has
placed no limits on the dissemination of scientific information but has acted to permit certain information to appear
on the label or in labeling of dietary supplements. Adequate alternative channels remain for the dissemination of
scientific information. For example, regulation of the information that may appear on the food label in no way affects
the ability of a scientist to publish experimental results in a journal. Moreover, any interested person may petition
for a health claim regulation.
The agency disagrees that these regulations should be subjected to the close scrutiny afforded restraints on the
content of pure speech. Of the cases cited by the comment to advance this argument, one is particularly instructive.
In 

Turner Broadcasting System, Inc.

 v.

 FCC

, the court declined to apply strict scrutiny to the ``must-carry'' provisions of the 1992 Cable Act, applying instead
the ``interest-balancing traditionally applied to content-neutral speech regulation or legislation ostensibly
unrelated to expression that is discovered to impose incidental burdens on speech.'' 819 F. Supp. 32, 39 (D.D.C. 1993),

 prob. juris. noted

, 114 S. Ct. 38 (1993). In passing the Cable Act, ``Congress employed its regulatory powers over the economy to impose
order upon a market in dysfunction, but a market in a commercial commodity nevertheless; not a market in speech'' (

Id

. at 40). Similarly, with the 1990 amendments Congress sought to bring order to the food market. (See, e.g., 136 Congressional
Record S16611 (October 24, 1990) (statement of Sen. Hatch) (``It is up to us to make order out of chaos in the regulation
of food * * *.''); 136 Congressional Record H12953 (October 26, 1990) (statement of Rep. Waxman) (``[T]he bill will
once and for all settle the confusion surrounding health claims.'')). As discussed in the final rule on health claims
for foods in conventional food form, the case law establishes that FDA's power to regulate the food label derives from
its broad regulatory powers over food (58 FR 2525). As in 

Turner

, these regulations are valid under the limited scrutiny that has been afforded restrictions on speech under extensive
regulatory schemes involving areas of economic activity (

Id

).
The comment argued that the regulations are impermissibly discriminatory because they require government regulators
to exercise judgment based on subjective line-drawing, guided not by rational principles of law and science but by
the will of the censorship authority. FDA disagrees. The agency has carefully articulated the appropriate scientific
standard that it will apply to proposed health claims. Unlike the ordinance at issue in 

Forsyth County

 v. 

Nationalist Movement

, cited by the comment, the decision whether to authorize a health claim is not left to the agency's whim but is based
on objective factors. 112 S. Ct. 2395, 2403 (1992). In 

Forsyth

, the county administrator's exercise of discretion to vary the fee for assembling or parading was not reviewable
and did not require an explanation (Id). FDA's procedure for evaluating a proposed health claim, including use of
notice and comment rulemaking, presents a far different situation, and one that does not offend the Constitution.
Contrary to the comment's assertion, the fact that FDA does not presume to prohibit the publication of health claims
in the popular media does not show an ``arbitrary predilection to enforce [the] law against particular speakers and
forum owners rather than others.'' FDA has no interest in regulating the dissemination of scientific information
in the popular media and has no authority to do so. Rather, its strong interest is in ensuring that health claims made
in labeling, on which consumers are likely to rely when making purchasing decisions, are truthful, not misleading,
and scientifically valid. The agency's action contrasts with the categorical ban on commercial newsracks struck
down in

 City of Cincinnati

 v. 

Discovery Network, Inc.

, 113 S. Ct. 1505. In that case, the Supreme Court held that the restriction, which was intended to advance Cincinnati's
interest in safety and esthetics, overemphasized the distinction between commercial and noncommercial speech
by prohibiting only newsracks holding commercial handbills and not those holding ordinary newspapers (

Id

. at 1514). The city thus discriminated against a use of newsracks that was no more harmful to safety and esthetics than
the use it permitted (Id. at 1511). On the other hand, FDA's regulation of health claims in labeling bears a specific
relationship to the interests the agency has asserted, because it is directed specifically at ensuring the reliability
and validity of these claims (see 

id

. at 1514.) Contrary to the comment's assertion, the limited scope of FDA's regulations_i.e., food labeling_does
not amount to discrimination. 
Finally, the agency disagrees that its regulations deny the constitutional rights of willing listeners, viewers,
and readers. First, this argument overstates the impact of these regulations, which will affect only the labeling
of dietary supplements and not other sources of information about these products. Second, these regulations will
actually advance consumers' First Amendment interest in obtaining information on which to base a purchasing decision,
``by insuring that the information is not false or deceptive'' (

National Commission on Egg Nutrition

 v.

 FTC

, 570 F.2d 157, 162 (7th Cir. 1977), 

cert. denied

, 439 U.S. 821 (1978)). ``The fact that health is involved enhances the interests of both consumers and the public in
being assured `that the stream of commercial information flow clearly as well as freely''' (Id. (citing 

Virginia State Board of Pharmacy

 v. 

Virginia Citizens Consumer Council

, 425 U.S. 748, 772 (1976)); see also 

American Home Products

 v.

 FTC

, 695 F.2d 681, 714 (3d Cir. 1982)).


3. Commercial Speech


31b. Two comments asserted that, if health claims on labels are considered commercial speech, FDA's regulations
violate the First Amendment because they are more restrictive than necessary to achieve the government's goals.
One comment recognized that FDA has ``a great interest in preventing false and misleading claims and in preventing
fraud in the marketplace,'' but argued that closing the door on truthful, qualified claims that are based on significant
scientific evidence is not reasonably responsive to those interests. The other comment asserted that the wholesale
suppression of truthful, nonmisleading speech carries with it the silencing of speech indispensable to the health
of the American people, and that the agency's action not only lacks a rational relationship to the end chosen, public
health, but actually undercuts that goal by shrouding the public in ignorance.
FDA disagrees that these regulations, if considered under the commercial speech doctrine, are unconstitutional.
The final rule on health claims for foods in conventional food form, 58 FR 2478 at 25262527 (January 6, 1993),
contains an analysis of that regulation in light of the four-part test set out in 

Central Hudson Gas  Electric Corp.

 v.

 Public Service Commission

, 447 U.S. 557, 563564 (1980). That discussion is equally applicable to the present rulemaking. 

 Central Hudson

 states that commercial speech that is inherently misleading is not protected and may be prohibited (

Id

.). Speech that is only potentially misleading may be restricted, so long as the restrictions directly advance a substantial
governmental interest and are no more extensive than necessary to serve that interest (

Id

. at 566). 
The comments do not dispute the government's substantial interest in promoting public health by ensuring that consumers
have access to information about dietary supplements that is scientifically valid, truthful, reliable, informative,
and not misleading. (Indeed, one comment stated that the government's interest is ``great.'') Rather, the comments
focus on the last two parts of the 

Central Hudson

 test: whether the regulations directly advance the governmental interest, and whether there is a reasonable fit
between regulatory ends and means. 
FDA disagrees that its regulations will undercut its stated goals. Rather, the regulations directly advance the
governmental interest. The regulations provide for FDA review of the relevant scientific evidence on a proposed
health claim before the agency decides whether to authorize use of the claim. In this way, the regulations ensure that
health claims are scientifically valid and reliable, and that they will not mislead consumers. At the same time, the
regulatory scheme encourages the provision of information to consumers that will enable them to maintain healthful
dietary practices. Thus, these regulations advance the government's interest in a ``direct and material way'' (Edenfield
v. Fane, 113 S. Ct. 1792, 1798 (1993)). 
FDA also disagrees that these regulations are more extensive than necessary to serve the government interest. Recently,
the Supreme Court stated that the ``commercial speech cases require a fit between the restriction and the government
interest that is not necessarily perfect, but reasonable'' (

United States

 v.

 Edge Broadcasting Co.

, 113 S. Ct. 2696, 2705 (1993) (citing 

Board of Trustees

 v.

 Fox

, 492 U.S. 469, 480 (1989); 

Posadas de Puerto Rico Associates

 v.

 Tourism Co. of Puerto Rico

, 478 U.S. 328, 344 (1986))). In

 Edge

, the Court upheld a federal statute prohibiting the broadcast of lottery advertising by a broadcaster licensed to
a State that does not allow lotteries. Although the law prevented a broadcaster in North Carolina, with a majority
of its listeners in Virginia, from airing nonmisleading advertisements for Virginia's lottery, the Court had ``no
doubt that the fit * * * was a reasonable one.'' 

Edge

, 113 S. Ct. at 2705. The Court stated that the validity of a restriction should be judged ``by the relation it bears to
the general problem of accommodating the policies of both lottery and nonlottery States, not by the extent to which
it furthers the Government's interest in an individual case.'' 

Id

. (citing 

Ward

 v.

 Rock Against Racism

, 491 U.S. 781 (1989)). Moreover, once the government has established a strong interest in adopting and enforcing
rules of conduct designed to protect the public, it is entitled to protect its interest by applying a prophylactic
rule to those circumstances generally, Id. at 2706 (citing 

Ohralik

 v.

 Ohio State Bar Association

, 436 U.S. 447, 464 (1978)). 
After considering alternate approaches, the agency has concluded that the procedures and scientific standard set
out in these regulations best advance its stated interests under the act. (See discussion

 supra

.) As in

 Edge

, the government has weighed competing interests: the interest in making information available on the dietary supplement
label and in its labeling about the relationship between nutritional substances and disease or health-related conditions,
and the interest in ensuring that the information provided is scientifically valid, informative, and not misleading.
As in 

Ohralik

 and

 Edge

, the agency is entitled to protect its interest by applying a prophylactic rule to general circumstances, in this
case by permitting only health claims about substance-disease relationships that the agency has determined are
scientifically valid to appear in labeling. See 

Edge

, 113 S. Ct. at 2706. 
The means that FDA has chosen to further its substantial interest are reasonable, ``in proportion to the interest
served,'' and ``narrowly tailored to achieve the desired objective.'' 

 City of Cincinnati

 v.

 Discovery Network, Inc

., 113 S. Ct. at 1510 n.12 (quoting 

Fox

, 492 U.S. at 480). The regulations specifically target labeling claims about relationships between substances
and disease or health-related conditions. They are not intended to restrict the flow of information to the public,
but rather to ensure that the scientific validity of information provided to consumers in the labeling of a product
has been established. Indeed, the regulations leave open a broad range of other possible methods of communication.


4. Chilling Effect


31c. One comment asserted that an overbroad suppression of scientific speech on communications media used by manufacturers
creates a pervasive chilling effect on their willingness (and that of the scientists they employ) to communicate
their findings for public and professional consideration. 
The overbreadth doctrine is an exception to traditional rules of standing and is applicable in First Amendment cases
in order to ensure that an overbroad statute does not chill the exercise of protected rights. 

Leonardson

 v.

 City of E. Lansing

, 896 F.2d 190, 195 (6th Cir. 1990)). The doctrine may apply to a regulation that, in all its applications, directly
restricts protected First Amendment activity and is not narrowly tailored 

 Secretary of State of Maryland

 v.

 Joseph H. Munson Co.

, 467 U.S. 947, 965 n.13 (1984). FDA disagrees that these regulations are overbroad or that they will chill free speech.
The activity prohibited under the act and these regulations_marketing dietary supplements bearing unapproved
health claims in their labeling_constitutes a ``core of easily identifiable and constitutionally proscribable
conduct,'' (467 U.S. at 965966). Labeling is defined in the act and easily identifiable. See 21 U.S.C. 321(m)
(``The term labeling means all labels and other written, printed, or graphic matter (1) upon any article or any of its
containers or wrappers, or (2) accompanying such article.''). Moreover, courts have held that misbranding food
is not protected under the First Amendment. See, e.g., 

Kellogg Co.

 v.

 Mattox

, 763 F. Supp. 1369, 1381 (N.D. Tex. 1991), 

aff'd

 sub nom. 

Kellogg Co.

 v. 

Morales

, 940 F.2d 1530 (5th Cir. 1991); 

United States

 v.

 General Nutrition, Inc.

, 638 F. Supp. 556, 562 (W.D.N.Y. 1986); 

United States

 v.

 Articles of Food * * * Clover Club Potato Chips

, 67 F.R.D. 419, 424 (D. Idaho 1975). Finally, as discussed above, the regulations are narrowly tailored to accomplish
the government's goals. 
In any event, it is doubtful that the overbreadth doctrine would apply to these regulations, particularly if they
are considered to regulate commercial speech, because the overbreadth doctrine does not apply to commercial speech.
``[C]ommercial speech is generally considered less susceptible to the chilling effect of regulation than other,
more traditionally recognized forms of speech, such as political discourse.'' 

 Kraft, Inc.

 v.

 FTC

, 970 F.2d 311, 321 (7th Cir. 1992), 

cert. denied

, 113 S. Ct. 1254 (1993). 


B. Fifth Amendment


32. One comment asserted that the takings clause of the United States Constitution provides protection to dietary
supplement trade names. It argued that 101.14 might proscribe certain trade names that FDA has allowed to remain
on the market for years. The comment urged FDA to give more attention, under Executive Order 12630, to the regulation's
possible takings implications.
When it issued its final regulations governing conventional foods under the 1990 amendments, FDA fully discussed
the takings implications of those regulations. (See 58 FR at 2397 through 2400 and 2528 through 2529). This discussion,
including the underlying takings analysis, is incorporated herein. The agency concluded that there would be no regulatory
taking under the Fifth Amendment if a manufacturer is required to alter its brand name when the brand name asserts by
implication a relationship between the presence or level of a substance in the food and a disease or health-related
condition, and that relationship is not the subject of an approved health claim (58 FR at 2529). Because the agency
conducted its analysis before passage of the DS act, it fully took into account the regulations' impact on dietary
supplements. Although the comment stated that FDA must address the issues raised by its regulations in light of Executive
Order 12630, it did not provide any additional information that the agency has not already considered. Therefore,
the agency concludes that it is not necessary to address potential takings issues in any greater detail.


V. Other Issues


33. A few comments objected to the period of time provided for public comment on the proposal, stating that it was too
short. One of these comments asserted that FDA had no reason to establish such a short deadline other than to curtail
public input on the proposed regulations. Another of these comments requested that FDA extend the period for public
comment on the proposed regulations to give consumer advocacy groups, health care professionals, and the scientific
community adequate time to prepare the information and opinions needed to fairly resolve the issues associated with
the proposal.
As explained in the preamble of the proposals, the DS act requires that final rules implementing the 1990 amendments
with respect to dietary supplements be issued by December 31, 1993. To meet this statutory timeframe, FDA was forced
to limit the comment period for the proposed regulations to 60 days. Thus, the agency reaffirms that it is unable to
grant any extensions to the comment period. 
34. One comment requested that FDA clarify that the compliance date is the date on which manufacturers of dietary supplements
must begin to label products in accordance with 101.14.
FDA advises that the comment is correct. Section 10(a)(2) of the 1990 amendments specifically states that ``* * * section
403(r) of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act * * * shall not apply to food 

which was labeled 

before the effective date of the amendments * * * [emphasis added].'' Accordingly, the effective date of the health
claims regulations for dietary supplements adopted by the agency under section 403(r) refers to the date on which
a dietary supplement is labeled.
35. A number of comments concerned the requirement in 101.14(d)(2)(iv) that states that all claims must appear
in one place, in the same type size, without intervening material. The comments addressed the exception in this provision
that a short reference statement may appear on the label, ``See ______ for information about the relationship between
______ and ______,'' with the blanks filled in with references to the location of the labeling on which the full claim
appears, the name of the substance, and the disease or health-related condition. The comment requested that FDA allow
graphic material constituting an implied health claim to appear on the PDP without the accompanying referral statement
or full health claim, as long as the graphic material appeared in conjunction with the full health claim elsewhere
on the labeling. The comment justified this request based on the lack of sufficient label space on the PDP for the referral
statement.
FDA does not believe that it should make the requested revision in 101.14(d)(2)(iv). In situations where graphic
material constitutes an implied health claim, and the reference statement is not present, the graphic material on
the labeling is in fact a shortened form of the health claim. FDA explained in response to comment 69 in the health claims
final rule that shortened health claims are misleading because they do not include facts that are material in light
of the representation that is made and that are necessary to understand the claim in the context of the daily diet. 


IV. Impact Statements


A. Economic Impact


In its dietary supplement labeling proposals pertaining to health claims, nutrition labeling, and nutrient content
claims in the June 18, 1993 

Federal Register

 (58 FR 33700, 33715, and 33731), FDA stated that the proposed rules on the labeling of dietary supplements, taken as
a whole, would have associated costs of approximately $20 million. Thus, the agency concluded that the proposed rules
do not constitute a major rule as defined by Executive Order 12291. In accordance with the Regulatory Flexibility
Act (Pub. L. 96354), FDA explored whether the proposed rules may have a significant impact on small businesses
and tentatively concluded that they do not.
FDA has evaluated many comments that it received in response to its economic impact analysis. Because the issues raised
in the comments relate to all three proposals, FDA has combined its discussion of these comments and presented them
in the final rule regarding the establishment of the date of application published elsewhere in this issue of the 

Federal Register

.
FDA has examined the economic implications of the final rules as required by Executive Order 12866 and the Regulatory
Flexibility Act (Pub. L. 96354). Executive Order 12866 directs agencies to assess all costs and benefits of
available regulatory alternatives and, when regulation is necessary, to select regulatory approaches that maximize
net benefits (including potential economic, environmental, and public health and safety effects; distributive
impacts; and equity). The Regulatory Flexibility Act requires that the agency analyze the options for regulatory
relief for small businesses. FDA has concluded, based on its review of the available data and comments, that these
final rules are not significant as that term is defined by Executive Order 12866. Further, in accordance with the Regulatory
Flexibility Act, the agency certifies that these final rules will not have a significant impact on a substantial number
of small businesses.


B. Environmental Impact


The agency has previously considered the environmental effects of this rule when it was part of the proposed rule pertaining
to both foods in conventional food form and dietary supplements (November 27, 1991 

Federal Register

 (56 FR 60537 at 60562)). At that time, FDA determined under 25.24(a)(8) and (11) that the proposed action was
of a type that does not individually or cumulatively have a significant impact on the human environment. No new information
or comments have been received with respect to health claims for dietary supplements that would affect the agency's
previous determination that there is no significant impact on the human environment, and that an environmental impact
statement is not required. 


C. Paperwork Reduction Act


In the dietary supplement proposal of June 18, 1993 (58 FR 33700 at 33714), FDA announced that the agency had submitted
to the Office of Management and Budget (OMB) for its review the collection of information requirements contained
in proposed 101.70, for petitions regarding the use of health claims in conjunction with food labeling on dietary
supplements. Also in that document, FDA published its estimated annual collection of information burden for this
provision.
None of the more than 1,200 comments received in response to the dietary supplement proposal addressed the content
of petitions under the proposed health claim petition requirements. Thus, the agency's estimate of the annual reporting
and recordkeeping burden from the health claim petition requirements contained in this final rule remains unchanged
from the estimate that it announced in June 1993.
FDA has submitted copies of the final rule to OMB for its review of these reporting requirements.


V. References


The following references have been placed on display in the Dockets Management Branch (HFA305), Food and Drug
Administration, rm. 123, 12420 Parklawn Dr., Rockville, MD 20857, and may be seen by interested persons between
9 a.m. and 4 p.m., Monday through Friday.


1. House of Representatives, House Report 101538, ``Nutrition Labeling and Education Act of 1990,'' June
13, 1990.
1a. 136 Congressional Record_House H58435845, July 30, 1990.
2. 136 Congressional Record_House, H1295112955, October 26, 1990.
3. 138 Congressional Record_House H12597 (October 8, 1992); 138 Congressional Record_Senate S17236 (October 7,
1992).
4. 136 Congressional Record_Senate, S1660716612, October 24, 1990.
5. DHHS, PHS, ``The Surgeon General's Report on Nutrition and Health,'' DHHS (PHS) Publication No. 8850210
(GPO Stock No. 017001004651, U.S. Government Printing Office, Washington, DC), 1988.
6. United States Pharmacopeia DI, ``NIACIN (Systemic),'' 9th ed., 1989, Vol. IB, pp. 17371740.
7. Centers for Disease Control, ``Recommendations for the Use of Folic Acid to Reduce the Number of Cases of Spina Bifida
and Other Neural Tube Defects,'' 

Morbidity and Mortality Weekly Reports

, September 11, 1992, volume 41/No. RR14, pages 17.


List of Subjects in 21 CFR in Part 101


Food labeling, Reporting and recordkeeping requirements.



Therefore, under the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act and under authority delegated to the Commissioner of Food
and Drugs, 21 CFR part 101 is amended as follows:


PART 101_FOOD LABELING


1. The authority citation for 21 CFR part 101 continues to read as follows:





Authority:

 Secs. 4, 5, 6 of the Fair Packaging and Labeling Act (15 U.S.C. 1453, 1454, 1455); secs. 201, 301, 402, 403, 409, 701 of
the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C. 321, 331, 342, 343, 348, 371).



2. Section 101.14 is amended by revising paragraph (a)(2), by adding a new paragraph (a)(4), and by revising paragraphs
(b)(3)(i), (d)(1), (d)(3), the introductory text of paragraph (e) and (e)(6), and (g) to read as follows:


101.14 

 Health claims: general requirements.


(a) * * *
(2) 

Substance

 means a specific food or component of food, regardless of whether the food is in conventional food form or a dietary
supplement that includes vitamins, minerals, herbs, or other similar nutritional substances.


* * * * * 


(4) Dietary supplement means a food, not in conventional food form, that supplies a component to supplement the diet
by increasing the total dietary intake of that component. 


* * * * *


(b) * * *
(3) * * *
(i) The substance must, regardless of whether the food is in conventional food form or dietary supplement form, contribute
taste, aroma, or nutritive value, or any other technical effect listed in 170.3(o) of this chapter, to the food
and must retain that attribute when consumed at levels that are necessary to justify a claim; and


* * * * *


(d) General health claim labeling requirements. (1) When FDA determines that a health claim meets the validity requirements
of paragraph (c) of this section, FDA will propose a regulation in subpart E of this part to authorize the use of that
claim. If the claim pertains to a substance not provided for in 101.9 or 101.36, FDA will propose amending
that regulation to include declaration of the substance.


* * * * *


(3) Nutrition labeling shall be provided in the label or labeling of any food for which a health claim is made in accordance
with 101.9; for restaurant foods, in accordance with 101.10; or for dietary supplements of vitamins
or minerals, in accordance with 101.36. The requirements of the introductory text of paragraph (d)(3) of this
section are effective as of May 8, 1993, except:
(i) [Reserved]
(ii) [Reserved]
(iii) For dietary supplements of vitamins, minerals, herbs, or other similar nutritional substances for which the
requirements of paragraph (d)(3) of this section will be effective July 5, 1994.
(e) 

Prohibited health claims

. No expressed or implied health claim may be made on the label or in labeling for a food, regardless of whether the food
is in conventional food form or dietary supplement form, unless:


* * * * * 


(6) Except for dietary supplements, the food contains 10 percent or more of the Reference Daily Intake or the Daily
Reference Value for vitamin A, vitamin C, iron, calcium, protein, or fiber per reference amount customarily consumed
prior to any nutrient addition.


* * * * * 







(g) 

 Applicability

. The requirements of this section apply to foods intended for human consumption that are offered for sale, regardless
of whether the foods are in conventional food form or dietary supplement form.




101.70(f) 

[Amended]


3. Section 101.70 is amended in paragraph (f) in the sample petition for a health claim, in the paragraph beginning
with ``The undersigned,'' by adding the words ``or 403(r)(5)(D)'' after ``403(r)(4)''. 



Dated: December 23, 1993.

</SUPPLEM>
<SIGNER>
David A. Kessler,

</SIGNER>
<SIGNJOB>
Commissioner of Food and Drugs.

</SIGNJOB>
<SIGNER>
Donna E. Shalala,

</SIGNER>
<SIGNJOB>
Secretary of Health and Human Services.

</SIGNJOB>
<FRFILING>
[FR Doc. 9331815 Filed 122993; 8:45 am]

</FRFILING>
<BILLING>
BILLING CODE 416001F
</BILLING>

